<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88708-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-08-88.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 131 / Friday, July 8, 1988 / ProposedRules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Coast Guard</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">46 CFR Parts 4, 5, and 16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[CGD 86-067] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Programs for Chemical Drug and Alcohol Testing of Commercial VesselPersonnel </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Coast Guard, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of Proposed Rulemaking.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Due to the safety and health concerns associated withdrug abuse by merchant marine personnel, as well as legal restrictionson drug use, the Coast Guard is proposing drug abatement programs whichinclude periodic drug tests (urinalysis) as part of required physical exams,preemployment testing and random sampling programs for all marine employees,and post accident and reasonable cause testing. The post accident and reasonablecause portions of the program will also involve testing for alcohol use.Four options are proposed concerning rehabilitation for those individualswho are detected as drug users for the first time. The Coast Guard is also proposing an implied consent provision for thechemical testing of license, certificate of registry, and merchant marinersdocument holders as well as for all individuals accepting employment onboard any vessel on which licensed, certificated, or documented personnelare required. Through chemical testing, the Coast Guard expects to discourage drug andalcohol use by merchant marine personnel, an activity which adversely impactsthe users, their shipmates, the marine industry, and the public in general.Chemical testing should also reduce the potential for marine casualtiesrelated to drug and alcohol use.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be received on or before September 6, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments should be submitted to the Executive Secretary,Marine Safety Council (G-LRA-2/21) [CGD 86-067], U.S. Coast Guard, Washington,DC 20593-0001. Comments may be delivered to and will be available for inspectionor copying between 8:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m., Monday through Friday, at theMarine Safety Council (G-LRA-2/21), Room 2110, U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters,2100 Second Street, SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001, (202) 267-1477.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. Sean T. Connaughton, ProjectManager, Merchant Vessel Personnel Division, Office of Marine Safety, Securityand Environmental Protection (G-MVP), Phone (202) 267-0229.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>Interested persons are invited to participatein this rulemaking by submitting written data, views, or arguments. Commentsshould include the name and address of the person making them, identifythis notice (CGD 86-067), give the specific section of the proposal towhich the comment applies, and the reasons for the comment. Persons desiringacknowledgement that their comment has been received should enclose a stamped,self-addressed postcard or envelope. All comments received before the expirationof the comment period will be considered to the extent practicable beforefinal action is taken on this proposal. No public hearing has been scheduled, however, the Coast Guard is consideringholding a public hearing on this proposal. If a hearing is scheduled, thetime and place will be published in a separate notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Drug and Alcohol Abuse in American Society Drug and alcohol abuse constitutes a major societal problem. Statisticscompiled and reported by the National Institute of Drug Abuse (NIDA), andby media polls, indicate the use of drugs such as marijuana to be widespread.While the problem appears to be ``youth centered,'' in that the majorityof users are in the younger age categories, the problem also exists inolder groups. For instance, based on random sampling and using populationprojections, data from the 1985 NIDA ``National Survey on Drug Abuse,''indicates the following: _In the 18 to 25 age category: _Sixty (60) percent reported using marijuana sometime during their life._Twenty-two (22) percent reported using marijuana within the last 30 days._Twenty-five (25) percent reported using cocaine sometime during theirlife. _Eight (8) percent reported using cocaine within the last month. _In the 26 and over age category: _Twenty-seven (27) percent reported using marijuana sometime during theirlife. Six (6) percent reported using marijuana within the past month. Nine (9) percent reported using cocaine sometime during their life. Two (2) percent reported using cocaine within the last month. Because of statistics like the above, many members of the public have expressedconcern that the use of drugs or alcohol by others may jeopardize theirpersonal safety. There is widespread public perception that drug or alcoholabusers should not be in safety-related occupations. A May-June 1986 nationalsurvey jointly conducted by Populus Incorporated, of Greenwich, Connecticut,and Decision/Making/Information of McLean, Virginia, produced the followingresults:_88 percent favored testing airline pilots and air traffic controllers._85 percent favored testing police and other law enforcement agents. _81 percent favored testing bus drivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">As the researchers indicate, the respondents believed that peoplewho are responsible for the physical safety of others should be tested.Another survey conducted by American Viewpoint, Inc., on August 6-19, 1986,examined the public's attitude toward drug testing and produced informativeresults, specifically, ``by a margin of 76 percent to 22 percent, Americansagree that the drug crisis today is serious enough for mandatory testing.''The American Viewpoint survey used a ``forced choice'' list and asked whichgroups should submit to mandatory drug testing. While the transportationmodes, e.g., railroad, aviation, highway, marine, etc., were not includedin the list, safety and health related occupations such as police and firefighters(84 percent), armed forces (81 percent), and doctors and nurses (81 percent)were at the top of the list. Another interesting fact was that 80 percentof the respondents indicated that they would participate in voluntary testingif asked to do so by their employer. The surveys suggest that the majority of the public is concerned aboutdrug and alcohol abuse and favors the testing of persons in certain safety-relatedoccupations. While the bulk of drug abuse occurs in the 25 and under categoryand overall usage may drop as this group grows older, maturation cannotbe considered a solution to the problem. The Department of Transportationin its regulatory role must operate under the assumption that the varioustransportation modes do not significantly differ from the overall populationin terms of drug and alcohol abuse. In February 1987, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) began performingdrug screens in connection with periodic medical examinations requiredof certain safety-sensitive agency employees. As of April 22, 1988, theFAA has received reports on 25,000 FAA employees urine specimens pursuantto its periodic testing program. Specimens for 25 employees have been determinedto include one or more illegal drugs. In addition, the Department implementedits employee drug testing program on September 8, 1987. As of April 22,1988, DOT has received reports on 1651 urinalysis tests pursuant to itsrandom drug testing program for DOT employees occupying critical safety-or security-sensitive positions. 15 employees have tested positive forillegal drugs. These employees are currently in counseling or rehabilitationprograms and have been relieved of their critical safety duties pendingsuccessful completion of these programs. In addition, since the inceptionof the DOT program, 6 employees have tested positive for illegal drugsas a result of reasonable cause drug testing. Drug and Alcohol Problem in the Merchant Marine It is reasonable to assume that because there is a drug problem in society,there is also a potential drug problem in the merchant marine. However,while the threat posed to society by drug and alcohol use and abuse isdiffused, the same cannot be said of the threat drugs and alcohol poseto transportation industries such as the merchant marine. Not only do personnelwho use drugs and alcohol pose dangers to themselves and shipmates, theyare in the position to cause, or contribute to, vessel casualties thatmay take human life, destroy property, and/or seriously harm the environment.The problem in the marine industry is increased by the fact that personneloften live on board their vessels for long periods of time. What in anothercontext might be considered ``recreational'' or off-duty drug or alcoholuse can have a detrimental effect upon vessel safety because the vesselis frequently also where the individual lives. Intoxicated personnel cannotserve their vessel in an emergency, and pose a hazard if they attempt toperform any necessary safety-related functions. Coast Guard data do not specifically identify the use of drugs or alcoholas a major causal effect in commercial vessel losses or casualty damage.However, the use of alcohol and drugs has had a substantial impact on marinesafety. Coast Guard marine casualty records spanning the years 1981 to1986 reveal 75 deaths, 52 injuries, and $6.5 million in property damagesresulting from casualties attributable to the use of intoxicants. In addition,during the same period, the Coast Guard took suspension or revocation actionagainst 89 seamen for alcohol-related offenses and 134 seamen for drug-relatedoffenses. It is acknowledged that the above data are sparse and are not conclusive.However, fatal accidents and suspension and revocation proceedings cannotbe the only basis on which to judge whether or not there is a problem withsubstance abuse. There is no way to gauge how many minor or near accidentsthere have been due to intoxication. The absence of widespread data may be due to several factors. First, theuse of drugs and the abuse of alcohol is something that many people goto great lengths to conceal. Second, detection by employers is not easy.Many merchant mariners never see their employers, or see them only on aninfrequent basis, and full-time surveillance by the Coast Guard and othersis neither practical nor economically feasible. Third, even when thereis supervision or surveillance of individuals, few people (including fellowcrewmembers) are trained in how to detect drug or alcohol abuse. As onecommenter to the Federal Aviation Administration's Advance Notice of ProposedRulemaking entitled ``Control of Drug and Alcohol Use for Personnel Engagedin Commercial and General Aviation Activities,'' (FAAD 86-20, 51 FR 44432,December 9, 1986), stated, ``We have been surprised by the persons whohave tested positive. Employees whose personal habits, appearances andlifestyles appear to be above reproach have tested positive for drugs andsubsequently admitted their use.'' Finally, it is possible there are individualswho are ``enablers,'' in that they may tolerate or cover for a person witha drug or alcohol problem, especially if the person might suffer the lossof a job and the associated adverse financial consequences. The Coast Guard has previously addressed the issue of drug and alcoholabuse in an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking concerning Certificationof Seamen (CGD 84-088, 50 FR 4875 February 4, 1985), and in a Final Ruleconcerning Operating a Vessel While Intoxicated (CGD 84-099, 52 FR 47526,December 14, 1987). A review of the comments submitted on these rulemakingsindicates that there is wide support for drug screening among marine companies,industry associations, and marine personnel. A recent Towing Safety AdvisoryCommittee (TSAC) recommendation objected to employer involvement in testingand enforcement, but otherwise endorsed the need to eliminate drug usersand those who operate a vessel while intoxicated from the merchant marine.While the Coast Guard does not dispute the professionalism of the vastmajority of those in the marine industry and their commitment to a drugand alcohol abuse-free marine environment, reports from some shipping companiesthat screen their crews for drug usage indicate that a significant numberof their employees were found to be users of drugs. In light of these factors the Coast Guard is proposing regulations to requireeffective chemical testing programs for holders of licenses, certificatesof registry, and merchant mariners documents and other maritime personnelin order to minimize the drug and alcohol problem in the merchant marine.The Coast Guard is very interested in receiving any additional data onthe use of drugs in the maritime industry. Readers will note that proposals by other modes in the Department of Transportationuse the term ``Sensitive Safety and Security Related Positions'' when classifyingpersonnel subject to testing programs. It is the position of the CoastGuard that all individuals engaged on board a vessel contribute to thefunction of the vessel or the accomplishment of its service. In additionto regularly assigned duties, each individual has responsibilities whichrelate to safety and to emergency situations. Non-performance of theseduties could pose threats to the safety of the individual seaman, the vessel,other persons on board, and the marine environment. Therefore, the testingprograms proposed in these rules do not differentiate between classes ofpersonnel subject to testing. The proposal applies to all individuals engagedaboard any vessel on which licensed, certificated, or documented personnelare required; such individuals perform sensitive safety related duties.<ITAG tagnum="84">Jurisdiction</ITAG>Congress has long recognized the danger posed by drug and alcohol use amongmerchant marine personnel. This is evidenced by certain statutes containedin Title 46, United States Code (U.S.C.), regarding alcohol and drug useby merchant mariners, particularly those who hold licenses, certificatesof registry, or merchant mariners documents.46 U.S.C. 2302 provides for penalties for all marine personnel who operatea vessel in a negligent manner or while intoxicated. The Coast Guard considers``negligent manner'' as including the operation of a vessel while underthe influence of drugs or alcohol. The standard to be applied in determiningintoxication for personnel operating commercial vessels was set out inthe Final Rule concerning Operating a Vessel While Intoxicated (CGD 84-099,52 FR 47526, December 14, 1987). This Final Rule set both a behavioralstandard and a blood alcohol concentration (BAC) standard of 0.04 percent.For those who hold licenses, certificates of registry, or merchant marinersdocuments, the laws contain additional provisions regarding drug and alcoholuse. 46 U.S.C. Chapter 77, ``Suspension and Revocation,'' contains strictprovisions concerning drug and alcohol use. The Secretary, under 46 U.S.C.7703, can suspend or revoke a license, certificate, or document if an individualhas committed an act of misconduct or negligence, or demonstrated incompetence.It is well settled that incompetence, misconduct, and negligence, includeacts involving alcohol and drug use. Under 46 U.S.C. 7704, whenever druguse is proved at a suspension and revocation hearing, revocation is mandatoryunless cure is shown.For drug abuse, 46 U.S.C. 7704 states:<ITAG tagnum="21">(b) If it is shown at a hearing under this chapter that a holder ofa license, certificate of registry, or document issued under this part,within 10 years before the beginning of the proceedings, has been convictedof violating a dangerous drug law of the United States or of a State, thelicense, certificate, or document shall be revoked. (c) If it is shownthat a holder has been a user of, or addicted to, a dangerous drug, thelicense, certificate, or document shall be revoked unless the holder iscured.</ITAG>In addition, in Chapter 75, ``General Procedures for Licensing, Certification,and Documentation,'' 46 U.S.C. 7503 dictates that:<ITAG tagnum="21">A license, certificate, or document authorized to be issued underthis part may be denied to an individual who: (1) within 10 years beforeapplying for the license, certificate, or document, has been convictedof violating a dangerous drug law of the United States or of a State; or(2) when applying, has ever been a user of, or addicted to, a dangerousdrug unless the individual provides satisfactory proof that the individualis cured.</ITAG>In both chapters, ``dangerous drug'' is defined as ``narcotic drug, controlledsubstance, and marihuana (as defined in section 102 of the ComprehensiveDrug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. 802)).''It is clear that the statutes are intended to exclude drug users and violatorsof drug statutes from serving on U.S. merchant vessels, as well as preventingthe operation of vessels by intoxicated personnel. The Coast Guard currentlyenforces the statutes through the examination of the criminal convictionrecords of license and document applicants and holders, through the prosecutionof those operating a vessel negligently or while intoxicated, and throughadministrative remedies such a civil penalty actions and suspension andrevocation proceedings. However, these methods have not been particularlyeffective since, as a practical matter, an incident typically must occurbefore the Coast Guard obtains evidence on which to base remedial or punitiveaction. With advances in the reliability of methods utilized to detectdrugs in urine, as well as the increased accessibility of test processingfacilities and the relatively simple procedures involved in collectingsamples for testing, the Coast Guard is offered the opportunity to proposerequirements that will effectively identify drug abusers. The proposedrequirements are similar in nature to those in place or proposed in theother regulated transportation industries, and are intended to ensure,to the extent feasible, uniformity within the transportation industriesof the United States.The Coast Guard's authority over commercial vessels is based primarilyon the type of vessel. Some commercial vessels, such as fishing and towingvessels, are not required to be inspected and are subject to limited CoastGuard regulation. Although the vessel itself may be subject to limitedregulation, some or all of the vessel's crew may, by statute or regulation,be required to hold a license, certificate, or document issued by the CoastGuard. To provide the greatest possible assurance that the commercial fleethas a safe, drug-free, work environment for all personnel, the Coast Guardis proposing that an individual may not be employed, including self employment,on a vessel in a postion for which a license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document is required, unless the entire crew is coveredby the proposed rules. This means that the entire crew of a fishing vesselover 200 gross tons, an uninspected passenger vessel, and a towing vessel,would be covered.<ITAG tagnum="84">Proposals</ITAG>Goals of TestingThe overall goal of testing is to foster a drug and alcohol abuse freetransportation environment which will continue to merit public confidence.A drug-free environment means that an individual covered by this proposaldoes not have dangerous drugs in his or her system at any time. If drugsare used, the individual could lose the right to work in his or her occupation.Thus, even ``off-duty'' use would be prohibited.In the case of alcohol, present urine testing technology only permits arough estimation of alcohol concentration levels in an individual's blood.For this reason, this proposal does not require urine testing for alcohol.The rule could be modified if there are advances in urine testing in thefuture.This does not mean the Coast Guard condones abuse of alcohol. The CoastGuard has issued a Final Rule concerning Operating a Vessel While Intoxicated(CGD 84-099, 52 FR 47526, December 14, 1987) that prohibits an individualfrom consuming alcohol on-duty or performing duties while intoxicated.Off-duty use is limited and subject to the restrictions contained in thefinal rule. With reasonable cause, testing to determine blood alcohol levelscan be directed.In addition to determining whether drugs have been used, the chemical testingprogram outlined in this proposal will enable the Coast Guard to collectdata as to the extent of substance abuse. This data will in turn enablethe Coast Guard to plan future action, such as education and training tocombat substance abuse.This NPRM proposes specific requirements for testing procedures and rehabilitationprograms. As noted below, the Coast Guard realizes that some of these requirementsmay be difficult to achieve as proposed. This may be especially true forsmall employers. The Coast Guard is interested in comments on ways in whichits goals can be achieved through procedures or programs without the needfor detailed regulatory requirements. For example, should Coast Guard permitprograms developed by consortiums of marine employers that conform withthe basic requirements of the following proposed specific program? As notedlater in this preamble, the Coast Guard is also interested in obtainingcomments on the feasibility and effectiveness of having Coast Guard approvecompany-specific programs that conform with the basic requirements of theproposed program. If this approach is adopted, an industry-wide program,developed by employers may be a viable and expedient mechanism to implementdrug abatement programs. In addition, this type of approval may providemore flexibility to the industry. If so, the Coast Guard requests detailedcomments on how such an approval program would be implemented. The CoastGuard believes that any divergence from the proposed specific program wouldhave to comply with its goals.Chemical Testing ProceduresOn April 11, 1988, the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) publishedfinal guidelines for drug testing procedures and standards for certifyingdrug testing laboratories (53 FR 11970; April 11, 1988). The guidelinesapply to drug testing programs conducted by Federal agencies themselves.This NPRM would direct regulated parties to conduct their drug-testingprograms according to these guidelines as well.The HHS guidelines include solutions to concerns such as the integrityof the sample collection process, maintaining a proper chain of custody,and ensuring that laboratories that do drug testing are qualified to doso.The HHS guidelines establish what illegal drugs must be tested for (marijuanaand cocaine), as well as additional drugs which may be tested (e.g., amphetamines,PCP, and opiates). In addition, the guidelines specify the levels of drugmetabolites in a sample that would result in a positive test being reported.The Coast Guard invites comments as to which additional drugs, if any,should be included. Commenters should also provide cost and benefit dataregarding any additional drug groups.The guidelines specify the types of tests that would be required for initialscreening tests (an immunoassay test) and confirmatory tests (a gas chromatography/massspectrometry test). The guidelines also specify collection procedures.These include the use of toilet bluing agents, temperature monitoring,and other steps to ensure the integrity of the sample without requiringobservation of the individual while he or she is providing the sample.The sample collection procedures also include filling out a chain-of-custodyform to accompany the sample as it goes to the laboratory.The guidelines for a laboratory processing of samples cover both technicaland procedural steps designed to ensure that a proper chain of custodyis maintained and that the test is conducted accurately. Intralaboratorychain-of-custody forms would be used; only authorized personnel would haveaccess to the sample. Records concerning the calibration of testing instrumentswould be maintained. Laboratories would report test results to the employerin a timely manner, and statistics on the tests would be retained by thelaboratory for 2 years.In addition to setting forth qualifications for key laboratory personneland quality control procedures for the laboratories, the guidelines includestandards and procedures through which HHS certifies laboratories. Regulatedparties would be required to use only those laboratories which HHS hascertified pursuant to these standards.The guidelines also mandate the use of Medical Review Officer (MRO) toreview test results. The MRO is specifically intended to ensure that drugtests were properly administered and that the test results were accurate.While the use of any controlled drugs, unless medically prescribed, isnot condoned, the Coast Guard recognizes that due to equipment limitationsand possible ``passive'' exposure to drugs, any test results indicatingdrug or metabolite levels below the cut-offs may not be accurate reflectionsof whether an individual has used drugs. Therefore, drug or metabolitelevels below these cut-offs will be considered a negative test result andwill not disqualify a person from service in the merchant marine.Prescription drug use, used as medically prescribed, would not generallybe considered a reason for corrective action; however, partial or totalimpairment due even to prescribed drug use is nonetheless a threat to safety,and, as is current practice, the Coast Guard may deny or suspend licenses,certificates of registry, and merchant mariners documents for this reasonin appropriate circumstances.Implied ConsentThe proposed regulations state that any individual accepting employmenton board any vessel on which any individual is required to be licensed,certificated, or documented would be deemed to have consented to submitto chemical testing. This implied consent provision is consistent withthe Federal Railroad Administration regulations dealing with substanceabuse.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>See 49 CFR Part 219.</ITAG>The existence of an implied consent provision would facilitate the acquisitionof breath, blood, or urine samples in a timely and efficient manner. Anindividual could still refuse testing since the regulations do not authorizephysical coercion; however, refusal would be considered a violation ofregulation and could subject an individual to proceedings which may resultin suspension or revocation of a license, certificate, or document under46 U.S.C. 7003 and Part 5 of Title 46, Code of Federal Regulations, ortermination or refusal of employment in the case of an individual who doesnot possess a license, certificate, or merchant mariners document.Periodic TestingThe Coast Guard proposes to require urinalysis in connection with requiredphysical examinations which are incident to various license or merchantmariners document transactions. Only those individuals required to receivea physical examination for a license or document transaction, or thoserequired to receive periodic physical examinations, would be required toundergo a periodic urinalysis for drugs. The testing would be part of thatphysical examination. The results of the physical examination and urinalysiswould have to be presented at the Regional Examination Center (REC) andan application would not be considered complete until the chemical testresults required by these regulations have been submitted. All test resultswould be kept by the REC and become part of the individual's file.Some individuals are required to receive periodic physical examinations,normally on an annual basis. When they renew their license, they wouldhave to present documentation of each urinalysis taken with a physicalexamination since their last license transaction. This would ensure thatthe individual received all required drug tests.An individual who has been subject to a random sampling program, and whohas been tested under that program would not be subject to the requirementfor periodic testing if the applicant provides satisfactory evidence certifyingthat he or she has been continuously subject to a random sampling programfor not less than six months, has not tested positive for dangerous drugs,has not refused to participate in required chemical tests, and has beentested within the past six months. However, even if the above conditionsare met, the periodic testing requirement would continue to be applicableto those individuals whose chemical test is part of a physical examinationfor issuance of an original license or merchant mariners document.Because the date of periodic testing is known to the employee, an individualwho uses drugs could stop taking them prior to the test in order to avoiddetection. However, not all individuals would have sufficient control overtheir drug use to do so. Periodic testing would have the advantage of beingless costly, since it would be performed during an already required exam.Because of the scheduled nature of periodic testing, comment is requestedconcerning its effectiveness. Should this type of testing be a part ofall future drug programs, or should it be phased out after several yearswhen the other forms of testing are established and working smoothly? Periodictesting would appear more likely to detect dependent drug users as opposedto casual users. After an initial round of periodic tests, most of thedependent users should be detected and, therefore, the benefits of additionalperiodic testing may decrease. The Coast Guard, therefore, is also consideringonly requiring periodic testing once for each licensed individual. Thisalternative would significantly cut down on the costs of testing, and inlight of other testing measures such as pre-employment and random testing,commenters should address the costs and benefits associated with this alternative.Preemployment Testing ProgramsThe Coast Guard is proposing that preemployment testing be required ofall applicants for employment aboard any vessel on which licensed, certificated,or documented personnel are required. The purpose of testing applicantsis twofold: One, it would convey a clear message that the employer is seriousabout establishing and maintaining a drug-free environment; and two, itwould help identify those who are either addicted to or so dependent upondrugs that they cannot abstain from drug use. Applicants would be informedthat tests will be conducted to determine the presence of drugs. The conceptof preemployment testing is flawed to some extent because individuals canavoid detection by abstinence. However, data on preemployment testing inthe airline industry reveals some positive test results ranging from 4.2percent to 20 percent among selected carriers. As such, preemployment testingdoes provide a valuable service in the selection of employees.It is intended that the preemployment testing program be employer sponsored,however, the Coast Guard will consider other arrangements that would produceequivalent coverage. The Coast Guard recognizes that, in many instances,employment on commercial vessels is of relatively short duration, suchas a single voyage, and that unduly repetitive testing of an individualcould result. For pilots, their term of employment on a particular vessel,or for a particular employer, is frequently measured in hours. The CoastGuard specifically invites suggestions by unions, associations, or otherorganizations for alternative testing programs that would provide adequateassurance to employers that a prospective employee is not a substance abuser.The Coast Guard also recognizes that employment of crewmembers frequentlytakes place on short notice and test results may not be available priorto signing on a new crewmember at the time of vessel sailing. While thiscould result in some instances where a crewmember could not be readilyreplaced at the time the results were made available to the employer, theCoast Guard anticipates that the number of such occurrences would not besignificant since many experienced mariners will already be subject torandom sampling programs from previous employers. However, the Coast Guardmay revise the regulations to ensure that preemployment test results aremade available before a vessel sails, or make provision for the acceptanceof test results from previous periodic or random tests in lieu of the preemploymenttest. Comments on how to address this issue are specifically invited.Random Sampling ProgramsIn addition to the testing programs outlined above, the Coast Guard isproposing the implementation of employer-sponsored random drug samplingprograms. The proposed rules delineate the basic requirements for a randomsampling program.Random drug sampling applies the principle of random selection in thatindividuals are subject to drug testing at any given time. Periodic andpreemployment screening on their own may not be sufficient deterrents sincethey permit individuals to schedule periods of abstinence from drug use.It is believed that random sampling programs are the most effective methodcurrently available to limit potential drug use since they prevent a druguser from preparing for the screening in advance. There are data suggestingthat random drug screening can reduce drug use. In the Defense Department's1985 Worldwide Survey of Drug and Alcohol Abuse, overall drug use was registeredto have dropped from 27 percent in 1980, to 19.0 percent in 1982, and thento only 8.9 percent in 1985. This drop in drug use corresponds to the implementationof servicewide random sampling programs. The Coast Guard's own experiencewith random sampling of its uniformed personnel has resulted in detecteddrug use falling 75 percent in the five years since the program was implemented.The success of the military's program, as well as those in industry, leadsthe Coast Guard to believe that random sampling would significantly limitthe use of drugs in the marine industry.It is envisioned that random sampling programs would be mandatory for allemployers owning or operating vessels on which crewmembers are requiredto hold licenses, certificates of registry, or merchant mariners documents.Testing would be required for all personnel on inspected vessels and uninspectedvessels on which any one or more personnel are required to be licensed,registered, or certificated. The Coast Guard's regulatory authority overthese types of vessels and personnel is generally contained in 46 U.S.C.2103, 3306, 7101, 7301, and 7701.Besides employer-sponsored programs, there are alternative approaches thatcould be used to implement random programs, including Coast Guard or Stateadministered programs. However, both of these alternatives were consideredand rejected due to perceived problems with effectiveness, authority, cost,and applicability on both the federal and state level. The Coast Guardbelieves that employer-sponsored programs are the most effective becauseemployers maintain routine contact with their personnel and have a vestedinterest in ensuring that their vessels and equipment are used properly.Random selection means that every member of a given population has an equalchance of selection on a scientifically valid basis. Random selection wouldbe accomplished through the use of a random-number table or computer based,random-number generator. Both methods select individuals by matching randomnumbers against employees' indentification numbers, e.g., social securitynumber of employee, payroll account number, etc.The Coast Guard desires that the standards utilized for random samplingensure randomness and selection of a sufficient number of employees toforce drug users to modify their behavior. The Coast Guard requests commentson a range of possible annual testing rates up to 125 percent for randomselection. This does not mean that the rate will be set at that percentage,but it serves as a cap upon which comment and data are requested. In particular,the Coast Guard invites comments on documented cases or examples of otherrandom sampling programs, the testing rates that were used, and their success.How would different sampling rates affect the numbers of drug users whovolunteer for rehabilitation under each of the rehabilitation options appearingelsewhere in this text? Is there any evidence to support alternative assumptionsregarding the rates at which drug users would volunteer for rehabilitation?What is the lowest sampling rate for random testing that would be effectivein determining drug abuse? Would a lower rate be more effective if theseverity of the penalties increase? Would higher sampling rates resultin sufficiently higher benefits to justify the costs? Do lower samplingrates necessarily result in lower benefits? Is it reasonable to assumethat benefits are directly proportional to the sampling rate? Would thehigher sampling add sufficient deterrence to reduce the costs of and needfor rehabilitation? The Coast Guard intends to select an appropriate ratebased on effectiveness, deterrence, costs, and benefits. Commenters needto identify what that rate should be and provide the basis for their views.Random drug testing requires a specific implementation plan to deter druguse. For instance, a 125 percent plan would mean that a population of 1,000would be targeted to provide 1,250 annual samples. Using a true randomselection basis, employees selected for each weekly/monthly increment wouldbe returned to the pool of eligibles and subject to reselection. The possibilityof reselection ensures continuous deterrence in that an individual selectedearly in the testing cycle would still be subject to testing throughoutthe remainder of the year. One feature of this plan (which could be considereda drawback) is that some employees might not be selected at all duringthe first year and others could be selected more than once.The Coast Guard is considering whether the drug programs should providefor adjustment of the minimum sampling rate based upon the success of theprogram. Although a numerical target is needed as a benchmark for discussion,in actual practice there may come a point of sharply diminishing returnsfrom any set level as the mix of countermeasures detects most chronic substanceabuse and deters casual use. The testing program could be designed so thatit could be phased up or down as appropriate and in response to the patternof results obtained through the program. In combination with post-accidenttesting experiences, the results of random testing would provide the mostuseful gauge of the need. The Coast Guard is considering whether thereare circumstances under which the program should allow for the level ofeffort to be increased or scaled back based on a method of evaluation statedin the rule or, if an approval process is used, based on individual applications,and specially requests comments on this issue. The Coast Guard also solicitscomments on whether companies that develop exemplary records should berelieved at some future time from some or all of the requirements of thisproposal. As with other issued rules, the Coast Guard reserves the rightto make appropriate adjustments in the rule in response to public comments.Are there any other ways to reduce costs or improve the effectiveness ofthe proposed rule? For example, are there any ways to grant employers flexibilitywithout compromising the objectives of the rule? What would be the likelycost savings, if any, in a more flexible approach. The Coast Guard alsorequests comments as to whether the rule should contain a provision allowinga company with a high level of safety with regard to drug use, demonstratedover a designated time period, more latitude in determining the applicationof its anti-drug program.The Coast Guard is concerned that the standards developed for random samplingprotect an employee from harassment or discrimination. Thus, the CoastGuard is proposing to require employers to adopt a method of selectionwhich ensures randomness (e.g., random number table), and to conduct thisportion of its drug testing program at unannounced intervals.In view of the above, the following questions regarding the standards forrandom sampling are posed:1. Should the Coast Guard specify the method to be used by employers toselect employees for testing?2. Should the rule permit employers, especially the small ones, to usea third party to set up and maintain their drug testing program? They couldchoose to comply with the rule through the use of several options, including:(a) Form consortiums made up of small employers that would develop a centrallyadministered random testing program; (b) Form consortiums, and hire a contractorto develop and implement a random testing program; (c) Contract separatelywith an outside company that would set-up and provide these services; (d)Have existing industry-related groups (e.g. trade associations) set-updrug program in which small entities could participate; (e) Arrange tobe included as a part of a larger company's drug testing program. who wouldbe responsible for their implementation? Oversee their operation?3. Another issue in this area is the matter of ``randomness'' among shallor isolated populations. What, for example, is the meaing of a random testto an employee population consisting of only one employee, or a few employees?This problem is particularly acute if the owner or manager of the businessis also the sole person, or one of only a few persons, subject to testing.Similarly, although surprise is an essential feature of a true random samplingprogram, how can this be achieved when the employee is located in a remotelocation and must be transported some distance to provide a sample? Thiscould result in the loss of the element of surprise in many cases.  A fundamental issue with a requirement for employer-sponsored random samplingprograms is how to implement programs that are effective yet take intoconsideration the differences in the industry operations. Such problemsas high turnover of personnel, vessels operated by only one licensed person,companies with small staffs, and differences in vessel operations and serviceall combine to make uniform implementation of random programs an extremelydifficult proposition. To deal with these problems, the proposal also allowsfor the random sampling programs to be conducted by an association, union,or other organization with which individuals serving in the marine industryare associated. The Coast Guard encourages small operators to organizefor this purpose.  One of the more difficult problems associated with random programs is theimplementation of testing for individuals who own and operate their ownvessels. These individuals are both employer and employee, and occasionallyoperate with a small staff to assist them. The same problem exists forpilots, who in most cases operate independently from any ``steady'' employerand instead work on a contract to contract basis. We recognize that a requirementfor random sampling by and for these individuals would be extremely difficultto implement, and the Coast Guard welcomes any comments on how best toinclude them in the drug testing.  The requirement for random sampling may not only present practical problems,but may also have a disproportionate impact upon the owner or operatorof a small vessel. The proposed rule is applicable to all inspected vesselsand those uninspected vessels which must be operated by persons holdinglicenses, certificates or registry, or merchant mariners documents, regardlessof the size of a company or number of individuals in a vessel's crew. Forsmall vessels having only two or three affected crew members, the costof actually conducting the chemical test and verifying the test resultsshould be in the range of $100 to $300 per year, assuming a random testrate of 125%, the use of a Medical Review Officer (MRO) under the HHS Guidelines,and that outside resources are readily available for an employee assistanceprogram. Of more concern is the administrative burden on the owners andoperators in establishing and conducting a random test program and arrangingfor MRO services, employee assistance counseling, and rehabilitation. Becausethe Coast Guard is concerned with the adverse effect this rule may haveupon small entities, comments concerning this issue are requested. Specificcomments are requested on whether cut-offs could be used to limit the applicabilityof the rule, i.e. size of vessel's crew, total number of company seagoingpersonnel, the gross revenue of the company, etc. It should be kept inmind that many of the unlicensed and undocumented personnel on these vesselslater advance to hold a license or merchant mariners document and serveon larger vessels.While the Coast Guard is currently considering only applying random samplingprograms to vessel personnel, there are numerous categories of personnelin other marine related positions who, if intoxicated, can jeopardize thesafety of vessel operations. Shipboard personnel today are only a smallpercentage of the personnel necessary for vessel operation. Shoreside personnelperform many functions that are essential to vessel operations, such ashandling lines, loading or unloading cargo, operating ship or shoresidecargo gear and cranes, or transferring fuel. The potential for these shoresidepersonnel causing a dramatic marine accident is often just as great, andin some cases greater, than for those who actually serve on board the vessels.For this reason, the Coast Guard requests any comments on including shore-basedpersonnel in an employer sponsored program.The Coast Guard envisions that for any covered individuals who test positivefor drug use, remedial action could be taken. If illicit drug use is determined,the individual would be ineligible for seagoing employment in the merchantmarine until (1) he or she had been rehabilitated, if the individual didnot hold a license, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document,or (2) he or she was reissued a license, certificate of registry, or merchantmariners document, if the individual originally held one. Reissuance ofthe license, certificate, or document would be contingent on successfulcompletion of rehabilitation. Commenters should address whether the typesof procedures afforded an employee should vary depending upon the consequencesof a positive test, and whether the burden of proof on time validity oftest result should be borne by the employer or the employee. The issuesof employer rights to terminate or retain an individual and whether employersmust reemploy individuals after rehabilitation are discussed below.It should be noted that it is not envisioned that the Coast Guard willactually review and approve random sampling programs. It is estimated thatover 19,000 vessels would be covered by these rules, and most are ownedor operated by companies which have only one or two vessels. The size anddiversity of this population would create an enormous administrative burdenboth on the Coast Guard and the marine employers. By permitting programself-certification, this administrative burden would be avoided while permittingprogram sponsors to more easily implement programs which meet their operationalneeds. However, in cases where questions arise as to whether a programis meeting the standards proposed in this rule, the Coast Guard will reviewthe program to ensure compliance with the standards. The employer is responsiblefor carrying out the anti-drug programs, including compliance with theapplicable HHS Guidelines. Failure of the employer to do so, like any failureof a regulated party to comply with Coast Guard regulations, makes theemployer subject to enforcement action, including civil penalties. Thisshould ensure that employers do not circumvent the rules.The Coast Guard does not envision that any Government funds will be expendedfor random sampling, except those costs associated with suspension andrevocation proceedings for those holders of licenses, certificates of registryand merchant mariners documents who test positive for drug use. This doesnot include costs associated with data collection discussed below. Otherthan these, all costs would be borne by the industry, either the employer,the mariner, or any association or union that represents them. These groupscould cut costs by joining together to negotiate volume or large scaletesting contracts, since volume orders with laboratories will allow theprice per sample to drop significantly. The Coast Guard is consideringdefining what it considers an ``employer'' sponsored program to includethose innovative cost sharing schemes that may arise and which are legitimate.However, for an alternative scheme to be acceptable it should not representa decrease in coverage or effectiveness.Reasonable Cause TestingIn the Final Rule concerning Operating a Vessel While Intoxicated (CGD84-099, 52 FR 47526, December 14, 1987), the Coast Guard included a section,33 CFR 95.035, concerning reasonable cause for testing to determine whetheran individual is intoxicated. These proposals would go a step further byrequiring testing based on a reasonable and articulable belief that anemployee is using drugs, but is not necessarily intoxicated. Even if nomistakes are made at work, the employee may demonstrate a change in characteror behavior that is symptomatic of drug use or alcohol abuse. Such changesare normally characterized by mood swings and changes in appearance, attitude,and speech.Because of the subjectivity of the criteria and the possibility of employeeharassment, at least two of the employee's supervisory personnel wouldhave to concur in the decision to test an employee based on a reasonablesuspicion of drug or alcohol use. At least one of these supervisors wouldhave to be trained in detecting symptoms of drug use or alcohol abuse.Are there practical problems to this approach? Should the observers haveto be supervisors? There will be situations where only one supervisor isavailable or the only persons in a position to observe an employee arenot the employee's supervisors. What other criteria could be used thatwould protect a disfavored employee from potential harassment through testing?Should there be a limit to the number of times an employee can be subjectedto reasonable cause testing, in order to prevent unwarranted harassment.The Federal Railroad Administration has specified, in its existing chemicaltesting rule, the types of incidents that could justify requiring an employeeto undergo testing. Should there be specified circumstances, such as particularrule violations, under which chemical testing would be automatic? If so,what kinds of rule violations would suggest a drug or alcohol problem andshould trigger reasonable cause testing? Could a similar program work inthe marine industry? One difficulty lies in identifying which of the manyoperating rules applicable to vessels are sufficiently related to the mentaland physical condition of the person responsible for compliance to permitinference that the violation of the rule may be due to drug or alcoholuse. Should all operating rules so identified be treated equally, witha violation of any rule establishing reasonable cause for testing, or shouldviolation of only the more important or critical rules be treated in thismanner? Would the impact of establishing a list of specific rule violationsfall disproportionately on masters or persons directing the movement ofthe vessel and have little or no application to engineering personnel andothers performing tasks that may be equally important to the safety ofthe vessel but not directly related to its navigation? The Coast Guardwelcomes comments on whether this provision should be included in the finalrule, how this provision might be implemented, and recommendations forspecific operating rules which, when violated, would indicate reasonablecause.We propose to authorize employers to test for any Schedule I or ScheduleII drug, if there is reasonable cause to believe that a particular drugwas used, even though any Schedule I and Schedule II substances would notbe tested for in pre-employment, periodic, and random testing.Commenters also should present any data on the effectiveness of existingprograms which use reasonable cause- or suspicion-type testing. At leastone program that we are aware of provides for rehabilitation similar tothat proposed under option 3, but which was worked out by labor and management.Sanctions, in terms of salary loss, are potentially quite severe for personsdiscovered to have drugs in their systems as a result of a test. Commentersshould address the benefits, costs and deterrence value of such a program.Post-Accident TestingA number of toxicological sampling and chemical testing methods are availabletoday for accurately assessing post-accident drug and alcohol levels inthe human body: <T3>Breath alcohol testing </T3>is a well accepted and instantaneous meansof indirectly determining the blood alcohol concentration (BAC) level ina person's system at the time of the sampling if the test is properly administeredthrough the use of a correctly calibrated evidential breath testing (EBT)device. Breath alcohol testing will not detect the presence of drugs inthe person's system. BAC standards have been empirically related to functionalimpairment, and blood alcohol testing is widely accepted as proof of intoxicationdue to alcohol if conducted in a timely fashion following a serious incident.In this instance, what constitutes testing in a timely fashion is partiallydependent on the sensitivity and operating capabilities of the specificEBT being used. Breath alcohol testing may be conducted by non-medicalpersonnel. However, prior to being considered qualified, an EBT operatormust undergo a formalized course of instruction covering such subjectsas the effect of alcohol on the human body, scientific concepts relatedto breath alcohol testing, and proper use, calibration, and maintenanceof the specific EBT being used. Data obtained through breath alcohol testingmust be properly documented, but is not subject to chain of custody considerations.<T3>Urine testing </T3>will detect the presence of alcohol and/or drugsin the urine at the time of the test. However, urine testing is of limitedvalue in determining the recency of drug use because of the wide variancesin the time periods over which drug metabolites dissipate, or remain detectable,in the urine (e.g., marijuana is detectable for several weeks or more afteruse, while cocaine remains for no more than 2-4 days). Collection of urinesamples requires no specialized training and can be conducted by non-medicalpersonnel. However, to ensure the validity of sampling and subsequent testing,procedural safeguards are required.<T3>Blood testing </T3>provides the most accurate and comprehensive determinationof the level of alcohol and drugs in the blood at the time of the test.Also, blood test results are well accepted as a means of specifically identifyingimpairment due to alcohol if sampling is conducted in a timely fashionfollowing the incident. Impairment standards are not yet available fordrugs, but are currently being studied by the National Institute of DrugAbuse, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Blood specimens mustbe taken at a medical facility or by qualified medical personnel, and mustbe obtained in a timely manner (within a maximum of 8-12 hours after anincident) because of the relatively rapid elimination of drugs and alcoholfrom the blood. Blood samples must be refrigerated and the chain of custodymust be preserved.In a direct effort to improve the quantity and quality of marine safetydata and to implement provisions of the Coast Guard Authorization Act of1984 (Pub. L. 98-557), the Final Rule concerning Operating a Vessel WhileIntoxicated (52 FR 47526, December 14, 1987), imposed a requirement forthe owner, charterer, managing operator, agent, master, or person in charge(hereinafter designated as the ``marine employer'') to determine whetherthere was any evidence of alcohol or drug use by individuals directly involvedin a marine casualty. The rule provides two methods by which the abovedetermination may be made: by personal observation of an individual's demeanor,appearance, etc.; or through optional chemical testing methods includingbreath analysis, or urine and blood sample testing.The Coast Guard believes that many marine employers will opt to make apost-casualty intoxication determination through personal observation methodsrather than through chemical testing. This belief is based on two reasons.First, some employers will consider the expenses associated with purchasingsampling or testing equipment, training personnel, and arranging chemicalanalysis of samples, to be too great. Second, since marine casualty reportsmay be referenced in potential civil litigation proceedings related tothe casualty, some marine employers may be reluctant to obtain definitiveevidence of the role of alcohol or drugs in the casualty.While personal observation is a valid qualitative method for determiningintoxication, obtaining blood, urine, and breath samples and chemicallytesting such samples is absolutely necessary to accurately determine bloodalcohol concentration (BAC) levels and to detect the presence of specificdrugs in the body. Therefore, while the Coast Guard believes that the existingrules will improve marine casualty data to a degree, requiring chemicaltesting is considered essential for better defining the extent of alcoholand drug involvement as primary or contributing causes of such incidentsand for providing more reliable information upon which to base enforcementactions and is proposing mandatory post-accident testing. However, vesselpersonnel may not be physically compelled to provide samples under thisproposal.Requiring blood, urine, or breath sampling and chemical testing followingthe occurrence of <T3>all </T3>categories of reportable marine casualties would provide themost complete picture of the incidence of alcohol/drug-related accidents.However, to do so for all casualties would not be practical nor economicallyreasonable. The Coast Guard therefore is proposing to require samplingand testing following only those marine incidents which result in death,injury, or significant property or environmental damage. These would becalled ``serious marine incidents.'' A ``serious marine incident'' includesany marine casualty involving a commercial vessel which results in: Oneor more deaths; an injury to a crewmember, passenger, or other person whichrequires professional medical treatment beyond first aid, and in the caseof a person employed aboard a commercial vessel, which renders the crewmemberunfit to perform routine or emergency vessel duties (<T4>Note:</T4> It is also proposed to revise the definition of reportableinjury in the present 46 CFR 4.05 in order to conform with these new requirements.);damage to property in excess of $100,000; actual or constructive totalloss of any vessel subject to inspection under 46 U.S.C. 3301; or actualor constructive total loss of any self-propelled vessel, not subject toinspection under 46 U.S.C. 3301, of 100 GT of more. The term ``seriousmarine incident'' also includes a discharge of oil of 10,000 gallons ormore into the navigable waters of the United States, as defined in 33 U.S.C.1321, whether or not resulting from a marine casualty; and a dischargeof a reportable quantity of a hazardous substance into the navigable watersof the United States, or a release of a reportable quantity of a hazardoussubstance into the environment of the United States, whether or not resultingfrom a marine casualty. The Coast Guard recognizes that the extent of injury or damages associatedwith a marine casualty, or the quantities involved in a pollution incidentmay be difficult to discern or estimate in the immediate aftermath of suchan occurrence. Nevertheless, the marine employer would be required to makea timely, good-faith judgment as to whether or not an incident is, or islikely to become, a serious marine incident. When reporting marine casualties to which the sampling and testing requirementsare applicable, marine employers would be required to submit a ToxicologicalSampling Report (Form CG-2692B) directly to the Coast Guard along withthe Report of Marine Casualty or Accident (Form CG-2692). The ToxicologicalSampling Report (Form CG-2692B) would be required to be submitted whetheror not sampling or testing was conducted. (<T4>Note: </T4>Please refer to andSection; 4.06-1 of the proposed regulationsfor details concerning Form CG-2692B.) A second copy of the completed formCG-2692B would also be required to be included with any blood and urinesamples being shipped to the laboratory. A properly completed Form CG-2692Bwould constitute appropriate documentation of the chain of custody on thepart of the marine employer from the time of sampling until shipment. Thelaboratory would then indicate receipt of the samples which will completethe chain of custody. Following a serious marine incident that is not a reportable marine casualty,such as a pollution incident not resulting from a casualty, submissionof a Report of Marine Casualty or Accident (Form CG-2692) would not berequired. However, submission of a Toxicological Sampling Report (CG-2692B)would be required in these cases, in the manner specified above. All marine employers would be required to arrange and pay for blood andurine sampling at an American medical facility or by qualified medicalpersonnel as soon as possible after the occurrence of a serious marineincident, in all cases where it is feasible to obtain samples within 24hours following the incident. Each employer would be required to have availablean appropriate blood and urine sampling and shipping kit for use by medicalpersonnel. Employers would also be required to ensure the chain of custodyof samples and prompt shipment of samples to a laboratory for analysis.In some cases, chain of custody and shipment could be handled by the medicalfacility or medical personnel collecting the samples. These requirementswould be applicable to foreign vessels which experience serious marineincidents in U.S. territorial waters. However, operators of such vesselswould have the option to have American steamship agents arrange for bloodand urine sampling of involved foreign seamen. Because certain classes of vessels routinely operate beyond 24 hours fromAmerican medical facilities, it is recognized that in a substantial numberof cases, the obtaining of blood and urine samples at American medicalfacilities or by medical personnel will not be feasible. For this reason,inspected vessels certificated for unrestricted ocean routes (i.e., tankers,freighters, MODUs, and most offshore supply vessels) and inspected vesselscertificated for restricted overseas routes would additionally be requiredto be equipped with evidential breath testing devices (EBTs) and the meansto provide secure storage of urine samples. When a serious marine incidentoccurs involving vessels of this type, and blood and urine samples of appropriatepersonnel cannot be obtained at American medical facilities within 24 hours,breath testing and collection of urine samples would be required to beperformed on board as soon as possible after the serious marine incident.Marine employers would be required to train appropriate personnel in properEBT equipment use, to provide for secure storage of urine samples aboardthe vessel, to ensure the chain of custody, and to ensure prompt shipmentof urine samples to the designated laboratory. All marine employers would be required to have available blood and urinesampling and shipping kit(s) for use whether samples are collected aboardthe vessel or ashore. Marine employers operating one or more vessels withina local geographic area could satisfy this requirement by maintaining akit or kits at a central shoreside location. Standardized sampling andshipping kits would be made available for purchase through a designatedlaboratory, for an estimated cost of $25 per box. Evidential breath testing devices (EBTs) would be required aboard inspectedvessels certificated for unrestricted ocean routes (i.e., tankers, freighters,MODUs, and most offshore supply vessels) and aboard inspected vessels certificatedfor restricted overseas routes. They are to be selected from among thoselisted on the Conforming Products List of Evidential Breath MeasurementDevices amended and published periodically by the National Highway TrafficSafety Administration (NHTSA), Department of Transportation. This listingwould also be available through Coast Guard Marine Safety Offices and MarineInspection Offices. Similarly, EBTs would be required to be calibratedby use of a unit listed on the NHTSA Conforming Products List of CalibratingUnits for Breath Alcohol Testers. Calibration would be required to be performedwith sufficient frequency to ensure the accuracy of the device, but notless frequently than provided for in the manufacturer's instructions. Calibrationfrequency varies from as often as before each breath test to once a year,depending on the sophistication of the device being used. It should be noted that the proposed regulations specify that a BAC ofless than .02 percent is considered to be a negative result. 33 CFR Part95 presently defines intoxication as .04 BAC and above, however, the CoastGuard desires to know any EBT test results above .02 BAC to determine whetheralcohol could have contributed in any way to an accident, as well as whetherthere was a violation of 33 CFR 95.045 with its rules limiting alcoholuse. A BAC of .02 is the present limit for accurate EBT equipment readings,therefore, any BAC level .02 or above should be noted on Form CG-2692B,even if the intoxication standard of .04 BAC was not violated.In addition to the good-faith determination previously described concerningwhether an incident fits the definition of a serious marine incident, themarine employer would be further required to determine whether obtainingblood and urine samples at a medical facility or by medical personnel within24 hours is practicable. In this respect, the Coast Guard also recognizesthat commercial marine operations are unique when compared to other transportationmodes due to the frequent remoteness of vessels from land or medical facilitiesand personnel, and the inherent need for vessel crew members to providethe initial trained response for indefinite periods of time to a wide varietyof emergency situations such as fire, explosion, grounding, flooding, oilor chemical spill, etc. until the arrival of and relief by shore-basedor other assistance. Factors to be considered when determining whethersamples can be reasonably or safely obtained include, but are not limitedto, the vessel's capability to reach port within 24 hours; the feasibilityof transporting personnel to a medical facility ashore or transportingmedical personnel to the vessel; whether compliance will adversely affectthe safety of life, property, or the environment; etc. Cases of seriousmarine incidents in which sampling is not conducted will be carefully scrutinizedon a case by case basis to determine whether compliance could have beenreasonably and safely achieved. When it is determined that samples couldhave been reasonably and safely obtained but were not, the Coast Guardwould consider initiating appropriate enforcement action under 46 U.S.C.6103 or 46 U.S.C. 7703. A person who needs to be tested after a serious marine casualty is a ``persondirectly involved in a marine casualty or serious marine incident.'' Thisis considered to be a person who supervises, performs assigned duties inconnection with, or otherwise actively participates in, any commercialvessel operation or any activity occurring aboard a commercial vessel whichis a substantial factor in the events leading to the marine casualty orserious marine incident. The term ``person directly involved in a marinecasualty or serious marine incident'' also includes any individual servingaboard a commercial vessel who is fatally injured or who is injured tothe degree specified in 46 CFR 4.03-2. The following guidelines are givenfor determining the persons typically directly involved in a serious marineincident; (1) For a vessel casualty such as a collision or grounding: The master,person in charge of the vessel, pilot, deck or engineroom watchstanders,lookouts, and any other person who may have been performing duties relatedto the operation or navigation of the vessel, as appropriate, may be directlyinvolved. (2) For a vessel equipment casualty, such as failure of propulsion, steeringequipment, or auxiliary machinery: The chief engineer, engineroom watchstanders,and any other person involved in causing the casualty, may be directlyinvolved. (3) For fires and explosions: The master, chief engineer, and any otherperson possibly involved in causing the casualty, may be directly involved.(4) For injuries or deaths: The injured or deceased person(s), the person'ssupervisor, if the person was performing duties when the injury or deathoccurred, and any other person involved in the accident, may be directlyinvolved. (5) For oil or chemical pollution incidents not resulting from a marinecasualty: The person supervising the oil or chemical transfer operation,any other individual participating in such an operation, and any personperforming any duties or activities who may have caused or contributedto causing the pollution incident, may be directly involved. The Coast Guard recognizes that situations will undoubtedly arise in whichthe master or person in charge of a vessel is one of the individuals directlyinvolved in a serious marine incident and is subject to providing bloodand urine samples, or breath testing, as appropriate. Such individualswould still be required to ensure that the necessary samples are obtainedand tests performed, including their own. However, owners, managing operators,and charterers are equally responsible under 46 U.S.C. 6101 for arrangingcontingency plans for such eventualities. On a large vessel such as a tankor cargo vessel, for example, the chief mate, chief engineer, or otherresponsible, licensed personnel could and should be trained to assist themaster in ensuring that samples are obtained, as well as to arrange andwitness the master's participation when necessary. On a smaller vesselsuch as a towing vessel with a single licensed operator aboard, the ownercould establish contingency plans which involve the assistance or supervisionof shoreside personnel. Similarly, a situation may arise in which the owner, managing operator,master, and person in charge of a vessel are the same person; for example,the owner/operator of an inspected or uninspected small passenger vessel.In that instance, the single owner/operator would also be required to arrangefor sampling, including his or her own. If that individual is unwillingor unable to comply with the sampling requirements, due to possible intoxication,injury, or other reason, the Coast Guard may become actively involved inarranging for sampling, if notified of the incident. Limited numbers ofCoast Guard personnel will be trained and equipped to respond in such situations.As previously indicated, the Coast Guard would evaluate any situation inwhich samples could not be obtained to determine whether or not samplescould have been reasonably or safely obtained. When it is determined thatsamples could have and should have been obtained, but were not, the CoastGuard would consider initiating appropriate enforcement action under 46U.S.C. 6103 or 46 U.S.C. 7703. At room temperature, blood samples will deteriorate within a matter ofhours following extraction from the body. Blood samples would thereforebe required to be kept in cool or refrigerated storage until shipment toa designated laboratory for analysis; to be shipped in a standardized shippingbox which is lined with styrofoam and which includes a sealable ice canfor cold preservation during shipment; and to be shipped via an overnightfreight service to ensure arrival at the laboratory within 24 hours ofshipment. These provisions are designed to maintain the integrity of eachblood sample to the maximum degree that is reasonable, and to provide themost valid sample for analysis purposes. At room temperature, drug metabolites and other substances in urine willalso dissipate, though much more slowly than blood. For this reason, urinesamples need not be refrigrated after collection if expeditious shipmentto the laboratory is ensured; however, for practical purposes, urine samplesobtained at an American medical facility could be shipped in the same cooledshipping kit along with blood samples. Urine samples obtained on boardan inspected vessel to which on-board urine sampling requirements applywould not be required to be shipped to the laboratory by overnight freightservice; however, they would be required to be shipped by the next mostexpeditious means available. For analysis, marine employers must provide the samples to a laboratorywhich meets the HHS Guidelines. This may require increased costs to themarine employer in connection with overnight shipment of samples to thelab, however, this will provide a much higher level of consistency andconfidence in analysis results, and would ensure timely, accurate reportingof analysis results to the Coast Guard. RehabilitationThe NPRM proposes four different options concerning the circumstances underwhich employees would or would not be given an opportunity to seek rehabilitation.Under the first option, an employee who comes forward voluntarily or testspositive for drugs for the first time would be eligible for rehabilitationrather than be discharged. Non-employees given a preemployment drug testneed not be given an opportunity for rehabilitation. Once rehabilitated,the employee could be reinstated into his or her prior position. The secondoption would give rehabilitation rights to employees who come forward voluntarilyor who are identified as drug users during periodic or random tests, butwould not require that the same opportunity be afforded to drug users identifiedin reasonable cause or post-accident tests; those not afforded the rightto rehabilitation could be discharged. In the third option, only volunteerscould claim rehabilitation rights. Anyone testing positive for drugs couldbe fired immediately. In the fourth option, employers would not be requiredto offer an opportunity for rehabilitation. However, the employers couldvoluntarily offer a rehabilitation program. In all cases, employers wouldbe free to offer more rehabilitation options than the minimum proposed.For example, an employer could voluntarily offer two chances for rehabilitationrather than one, however, drug use following rehabilitation would subjectan individual's license, certificate of registry, or merchant marinersdocument to revocation proceedings. Employees who undergo rehabilitation,whether voluntary or mandatory, and want to retain or regain their positionwould have to meet the requirements of this rule to complete the programand receive a recommendation for reinstatement. Each of these approaches has its own merits. For example, the broad rehabilitationprogram anticipated by the first alternative is likely to maximize thebenefits to society by ensuring that more drug users will get the helpthey need. If users are simply fired, they will often lose access to, andperhaps incentive to use, rehabilitation services, and they will continueto be drug users. However, it could be argued that employees who are foundto be drug users through reasonable cause tests are less deserving of anopportunity for rehabilitation, and the second alternative would thereforeexclude them. The third alternative would be lower in direct costs, becauserehabilitation would only be required for employees who seek it voluntarily,but for the same reason this alternative might produce less in societalbenefits. To what extent would each of the three alternatives raise orlower costs and benefits? Is it reasonable to assume that more drug userswould self-identify under option (3) than under either of the other twooptions? Are the costs of required rehabilitation programs warranted bythe reduction in societal costs resulting from drug abuse? The Coast Guardspecifically invites comment on which of these or other alternatives offersthe greatest benefits at the lowest cost, while remaining consistent withthe intent and purpose of 46 U.S.C. 7704. The fourth option, under which rehabilitation would not be mandated, wouldbe the lowest in costs. This alternative may provide the most flexibilityto labor and management to determine the need for and the shape of anyrehabilitation program and that it also could provide deterrence to druguse and thus may yield large benefits with low costs. Commenters shouldaddress whether this alternative would be effective for the maritime industry.How would this alternative affect the deterrence value of the Coast Guardproposal? What impact would it have on the costs and benefits? Would notrequiring rehabilitation foster other approaches to combating drug usage?Under the first three proposed options, rehabilitation would only be requiredto be made available to those individuals testing positive for the firsttime; a second positive, including a positive detected during the monitoringprogram, would subject the individual's license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document to revocation proceedings or terminationof employment of an individual who does not possess a license, certificate,or merchant mariners document. In addition, refusal to surrender the license,certificate or registry, or merchant mariners document would initiate revocationproceedings. Present Coast Guard regulations provide that an individual who voluntarilydeposits his or her license, certificate of registry, or merchant marinersdocument and subsequently demonstrates a satisfactory rehabilitation orcure and complete non-association with dangerous drugs for a period ofsix months, can have the documents returned or reissued. A person whoselicense, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document was revokedfor use or possession of drugs is still subject to the three years waitingperiod in 46 CFR 5.901; however, the rules permit waiver of the three yearsupon completion of a rehabilitation program followed by a one year periodof complete non-association with dangerous drugs. The Coast Guard is considering applying similar voluntary deposit provisionsto seamen who are detected as having used drugs as the result of an employer-sponsoredprogram. Seamen who are eligible for and choose to undertake rehabilitationwould be allowed to deposit their license, certificate of registry, ormerchant mariners document with the Coast Guard. After completion of adrug rehabilitation program, the individual would have to enroll in a drugmonitoring program, which would include unscheduled drug tests. At theend of this period, the individual would have to present to the Coast Guardevidence of successful completion of the drug rehabilitation and drug monitoringprograms. At the time of the adoption of a final rule in this proceeding, we intendto provide procedures for the conduct of such tests. We invite public commenton what the final rule should contain. For example, should there be a uniformtesting period after rehabilitation, or should this be determined on acase-by-case basis? Who should make such a determination: The medical reviewofficer, the EAP counselor, or both together? Should the employee be involved?How could employee involvement be accomplished? If we adopt a uniform post-rehabilitationperiod, how long should it be? Is six months reasonable? Would longer periodsconstitute an unacceptable burden on employees and on the employer? Othersmight argue that a long follow-up period, such as one year, is called for.Should the length of the follow-up period depend on the kind of drug thatwas detected? Should it depend on the severity of the individual's drugproblem, as indicated by the kind of treatment that was found to be necessary?For example, should someone undergoing inpatient rehabilitation be subjectto post-rehabilitation testing for a longer time than someone who needsonly abatement counseling? During the post-rehabilitation period, should we prescribe the minimumand/or maximum number of tests to be administered? We would want to ensurethat any necessary tests would be given frequently enough to ensure thatthe employee is free of drugs. At the same time, however, we do not wantdrug testing to become an instrument of harassment of the employee or anundue burden on the employer. Here again is the issue of whether the numberof tests given should vary with the kind of drug used and the severityof the employee's problem.One alternative, on which we also invite comments, is a specified post-rehabilitationtesting period that would apply only if the employee, the EAP counselor,and perhaps the employer failed to agree on an individualized program.Such a fall-back system could provide, for example, for up to four additionaltests over the 12 months following rehabilitation.Ideally, the seaman would be retained in an employee status, which couldinclude leave without pay while undergoing in-patient or other intensiverehabilitation program, and employment as other than a crewmember whileundergoing an out-patient monitoring program. For holders of a license,certificate, or document, upon return of the individual's license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document; or for those not holders ofa license, certificate, or document, upon successful completion of a rehabilitationprogram; the individual would be entitled to resume the seagoing positionhe or she previoulsy held or an equivalent position.The Coast Guard seeks comment on practical problems that may arise incidentto rehabilitation efforts. For example, vessels subject to the inspectionand manning requirements of Subtitle II, Title 46 U.S.C., have prescribedminimum manning levels that necessitate the immediate hiring of personnelto replace the seaman undergoing rehabilitation. Even large vessels havefew, if any, positions that do not require a license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document, and many vessel operators do not have suitablealternate employment available ashore. These problems are intensified forsmall vessels with limited crew and shoreside employees.In considering the feasibility of implementing a comprehensive programfor assisting and rehabilitating employees, the following questions areapplicable:(1) What is the minimum employment relationship that an owner or operatorshould be required to maintain while an employee is undergoing rehabilitationand monitoring?(2) Should an employer be required to pay for rehabilitation and the drugmonitoring program? (The NPRM does not propose such a requirement.)(3) What is the appropriate duration of a monitoring program and the numberof random chemical tests that should be conducted during the program?(4) What should be considered a bona fide rehabilitation and monitoringprogram?(5) What are the appropriate roles for the owner or operator and the CoastGuard in overseeing the monitoring program?(6) Are the costs of required rehabilitation programs warranted by thereduction in the societal costs resulting from drug abuse?The Coast Guard believes there may be some employees whose normal periodof employment is too short to make it practical to require rehabilitationand reemployment. For example, even if a short term hire tested positivefor drugs, the end of the scheduled employment term might come before completionof the rehabilitation program. Therefore, the Coast Guard does not proposeto require employers to offer an opportunity for rehabilitation to temporaryemployees who are hired for a short period. That is, if such employeestest positive, they could be dismissed immediately.The Coast Guard is considering defining a temporary employee as one hiredfor a period of 90 days or less. However, there may be a considerable numberof vessels that typically hire seasonal employees for periods slightlyin excess of 90 days. For example, some small passenger carrying vesselshire additional personnel for the annual summer tourist season that lastsfrom Memorial Day to Labor Day. Should the temporary employment periodbe 120 days or some other period? Should the definition of temporary employmentprovide for different categories, by type of vessel or employee, and, ifso, what categories are appropriate? Would it be feasible to define thetemporary employment period as not more than 90 days, but provide for individualwaivers or extensions?We recognize that some employees hired on a ``temporary'' basis are actuallyregularly reemployed. Some of these employees are recurring seasonal employees,others are continually reemployed at the end of a specified term. Thesepersons are regular members of the industry, and thus should not be excludedfrom the opportunity for rehabilitation and reemployment. Comment is requestedon how to include these individuals under the rehabilitation and reemploymentprogram.The Coast Guard specifically requests comments on the (1) the merits ofexcluding temporary employees from the opportunity for rehabilitation,and (2) the definition of temporary employee.The Coast Guard is also considering not requiring employers to providean opportunity for rehabilitation and rehire under two other situations:employees on strike and employees scheduled for layoff. The Coast Guardspecifically requests comments on the merits of excluding striking employeesor employees scheduled for layoff, and asks commenters to define ``scheduledfor layoff.''Another problem concerns new employees. Should a seaman be offered theopportunity of rehabilitation and reemployment even though he or she mayhave joined a company only recently and might still be on some sort ofprobation? Should eligibility for rehabilitation and reemployment be basedon length of service, hiring status, or some other criteria?<T3>Employee Assistance Programs  </T3>One method of preventing, as well as encouraging the voluntary cessationof, drug and alcohol use is the establishment of an Employee AssistanceProgram (EAP). An EAP, in addition to including any of the rehabilitationoptions described above, includes education and training components.  An EPA program is multi-faceted and supportive in that it offers educationand training as a means of combating and preventing drug or alcohol abuse.It must be recognized that an EPA itself will not seriously deter drugor alcohol abuse unless accompanied by the threat of discovery by drugtesting. The Coast Guard had a Drug Exemption Program that was intendedto encourage Coast Guard military personnel to seek rehabilitation by voluntarydisclosure of past illegal drug use. A Commanding Officer's grant of aone-time exemption, following disclosure, precluded disciplinary actionand administrative action other than an honorable discharge. Rehabilitationfor members who were retained included counseling, education, and inpatienttreatment at U.S. Navy facilities for members diagnosed as drug-dependent.Users detected without voluntary disclosure were subject to disciplinaryor other adverse administrative action. The Coast Guard's experience between1980 to 1982 disclosed that the Drug Exemption Program failed to convincemembers using illegal drugs to seek help and cease their misconduct. Veryfew drug-dependent members were identified or treated and the incidenceof drug use did not appear to decline as a result of the program.  Based on the above results, the Coast Guard cancelled the exemption programand initiated a random drug testing program which witnessed a decreasein the number of routine confirmatory urinalysis tests from 103 per 1,000in 1983 to 29 per 1,000 in 1986. Thus, it is felt that the threat of detectionthrough random sampling is a necessary part of an effective drug program.It should motivate individuals to stop using drugs and may encourage themto seek help through EAPs voluntarily.  The type of EAP services provided should consist of the following:  (1) Educational materials regarding drug and alcohol abuse and the consequencesof such use from an employment, safety, and personal health/welfare perspective. (2) Annual and other recurring training in the form of classes, forums,speakers, etc. for supervisory personnel.  (3) If adopted, rehabilitation, to consist of referral and other servicesas well as procedures for returning a rehabilitated employee to work, andmonitoring their continued drug-free status.  The establishment of an EAP would not require payment of compensation forabsence from work to obtain counseling and treatment. Compensation remainsa matter between employee and employer.  Who should be afforded EAP services and under what circumstances? Whatis the estimated level of voluntary enrollment in EAP services at samplingrates of 125 percent and at 12.5 percent under each rehabilitation option?What are the estimated costs of individual EAP rehabilitation servicesunder each rehabilitation option? Should training be mandatory for employeesonly in the first year and required annually only for supervisors? Shouldthe Coast Guard specify a minimum training period?  It is recognized that not all employers will have the fiscal resourcesto implement a ``company'' EAP; however, the employer has a responsibilityto both employees and the public to provide for a drug and alcohol abusefree environment to the maximum extent practical. As such, employers couldprovide or make EAP type services available through one of the followingmeans: (1) A company operated EAP; (2) contractor/consortium arrangement;(3) arrangements with local community service organizations; or (4) otheralternatives justified as being workable and providing an equivalent levelof services. Comment is requested on the other possible alternatives. <T3>Oversight of the Chemical Testing Program  </T3>Procedures for testing and analysis of tests, as well as the accreditationof laboratories, must follow the HHS Guidelines under this proposal. However,because of the nature of the marine transportation industry, there is alwaysthe possibility that testing will be required of employees in remote locations.It is expected that every employer will attempt to ensure that all therequirements of the testing program are met. However, it is realized thatin some cases an employer will not be able to supervise testing or evenensure testing is performed; therefore, the Coast Guard intends to establishguidelines on acceptable deviations from the testing requirements and procedures.These guidelines would not exempt employers from the testing requirements,but would outline the instances in which testing deviations may be acceptableto the Coast Guard. Employers would be required to make good faith effortsto ensure that testing is conducted in the most expedient but proper methodavailable; non-compliance may result in administrative penalties.Employer Flexibility  The Coast Guard recognizes that drug use is a complex problem that requiresdynamic responsive solutions. The Coast Guard believes that its proposedprogram meets the agency's statutory mandate to promote safety and thatit responds to the public's need for a safe and drug free marine environment.The Coast Guard is also interested in comments on whether there are waysto increase flexibility in the program or reduce costs without decreasingsafety. For example, should the Coast Guard allow covered employers theoption of submitting to the Coast Guard a company-specific anti-drug programthat conforms with the basic requirements of the Coast Guard proposed rule? The Coast Guard recognizes the costs and burdens associated with drug abatementin general, and wants to ensure that marine anti-drug programs are as cost-effectiveas practicable. Would providing for company-specific programs encouragethe development of innovative solutions that may be less costly and moreeffective? How? Could similar innovations be developed under the proposalset forth in this notice? How can the Coast Guard ensure that its finalrule promote the development of efficient and effective solutions?  The proposed Coast Guard program includes a required random sampling ratethat could range as high as 125 percent of the tested population. Thislevel has proven to be effective in reducing drug use among Coast Guardpersonnel, but we have asked for comments on how low a testing percentagecould be adopted without undermining the deterrent effect of the testingprogram. Whatever sampling rate is chosen as the industry-wide norm, wouldit be possible for a company-specific program to be designed in a way thatwould allow employers who can justify a need to test at a lower or highersampling rate to test at this rate. How could this be accomplished?  The Coast Guard also requests comments on whether employers could alsolimit the size of the population subject to a full range of testing strategiesto those sub-groups of employers where an initial round of testing hasrevealed a more serious drug-use program. In such a case, the employersmay be able to rely on a less costly set of requirements to ensure thatemployees in sub-groups with less serious or more easily determined problems,remain risk-free. In addition, are there ways employers may avail themselvesof less costly and less instrusive technologies as such advances are madewhile ensuring an appropriate-level of safety? Are there other types offlexibility that the Coast Guard should consider? Commenters are requestedto submit any empirical data that support their views.  Could the current proposal provide similar flexiblity by simply providinga waiver for companies that, for example, ask to use a test they establishwhich achieves an equivalent level of safety? What, if any, fundamentalrequirements should be present in an acceptable company-specific drug abatementprogram, and what guidelines would the Coast Guard use in reviewing requestsfor waviers or amendments if such modifications are allowed? Should, forexample, the Coast Guard be required to approve any modifications thatare designed to achieve a safe and drug-free marine environment? Shouldthese requirements or review guidelines be different from modificationssubmitted by small companies? Should the Coast Guard be required to acton an application for approval of a company-specific program, an amendment,or a waiver request, within a set time period? What form should the applicationtake? What impact would allowing these alternatives for increasing flexibilityhave on the Coast Guard?  The Coast Guard invites comments as to what methods might be used to facilitatethe inclusion of small entities in the program and whether all small entitiesshould be required to develop and implement a drug abatement program. Commenterswho believe that the proposed rule should not cover small entities, eitherin whole or in part, should explain the basis for their views and describehow they would define small entity for this purpose.  Employee Privacy  The Coast Guard specifically requests public comment on what, if any, proceduresand safeguards should be prescribed to minimize the invasion of the privacyof the persons being tested. Since the provisions of 46 U.S.C. 7704 requirerevocation of the license, certificate of registry, or merchant marinersdocument of an individual convicted of violating a drug law or shown tobe a user or addicted to drugs, the proposed rules would require that theCoast Guard be notified of all positive tests of individuals holding licenses,certificates, or documents. A second positive would result in revocationproceedings being initiated against an individual's license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document. Are there ways to ensure thatan employer is aware of a person's past testing history without denyingthat person an appropriate level of confidentiality?The Coast Guard is concerned with the circumstances under which test resultswould be given to persons other than the employer sponsoring the testingprogram or the employee. For example, should test results be submittedto a prospective employer? If so, should the data be given at the requestof the future employer, at the discretion of the employer conducting thetest, or at the request of the employee? Another option is authorizingthe release of test results only in specified circumstances, such as caseswhere the employee had their license, certificate of registry, or merchantmariners document revoked after refusing to undergo rehabilitation or hadfailed a second test after rehabilitation.The potential for the release of data may also complicate the issue ofan employee's right to contest the results of a test. A urine sample thathad been subject to tampering could unjustly end an employee's career evenwith another employer, and it might be necessary to permit the employeeto challenge the integrity of the test procedure.There are other persons who may wish to know the results of drug tests,and it may be appropriate to develop rules to govern the release of testdata to them. For example, should the Coast Guard prohibit providing accessto test results to the general public, including the news media? Does theCoast Guard have the authority to do so? What about access by other governmentagencies which might want data for statistical, regulatory, or law enforcementpurposes?A related issue involves whether to distinguish between releasing generalstatistical data, such as the total number of positive tests at a companyin a month or year, and name-specific data. Small companies and their employeesmay have an especially difficult problem since small organizations willhave fewer people to test at any given time period. It may be that evenseemingly neutral statistical data would have the effect of identifyingan individual. This potential may be exacerbated if only a small portionof the population is tested in a year.Should the Coast Guard treat the privacy issue for the various testingprograms differently?The Coast Guard is proposing under some of the rehabilitation options discussedabove that employees not be fired on the basis of a single positive drugtest. As described elsewhere in this notice, the employee may have an opportunityfor rehabilitation following the first positive drug test. If the employeedeclines to take advantage of this opportunity, or if the employee doesnot successfully complete rehabilitation, he or she may be fired and theirlicense, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document subjectto suspension and revocation proceedings. If, however, following successfulcompletion of rehabilitation, the employee again tests positive for druguse, the employee may be fired and the employee's license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document is subject to suspension andrevocation proceedings without further opportunity for rehabilitation.This policy may involve some complications in practice. Implementationof the policy seems straightforward when an employer continuously employsthe individual throughout the process, but in some instances employmentis more transient, with many employees regularly moving from one employerto another. An employee might test positive with one employer and, withor without having completed rehabilitation successfully, move on to anotherjob. This possibility is great if the individual does not hold a license,certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document.In these situations, how is the second employer to know of the first positivetest, especially if the individual does not hold a license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document? How is a subsequent employerto know of a series of two positive tests with two different employers?What action should each of these parties take upon learning of a positivedrug test or tests with a former employer?One possible way of dealing with these questions is to require employerscovered by these rules to require job applicants to disclose, in writing,all instances in which they have tested positive for drugs within a certainperiod of time. A false response would itself be grounds for firing theworker. Comments on the merits of this disclosure approach are requested.In addition, if this approach was used, to what period of time should thedisclosure requirement refer? (e.g., one, two, or three years? Any timein the applicant's work history?) Should the disclosure requirement applyonly to positive drug tests under the provisions of this rule, or shouldany positive drug test (e.g., one conducted in connection with athleticsor school activities) have to be disclosed?Another issue pertains to a situation in which an employer has hired anindividual who the employer knows, perhaps through voluntary disclosure,to have had a prior positive drug test, and the employee again tests positivefor drugs. Should the employer then be authorized to fire the worker, eventhough this is the first instance of a positive drug test while the workerhas worked for the current employer? Should the employer treat the positivetest as a ``first positive test'' and provide an opportunity for rehabilitationif the last prior positive test was a certain amount of time in the past(e.g., more than three years ago)?What is the position of an employer confronted with an applicant for employmentwho tested positive twice within the disclosure period, but who at thetime of his application is ``clean'' or alleges that he or she has beensuccessfully rehabilitated? Should the employer refuse to hire (or, indeed,be barred from hiring) the applicant? (Where they apply, statutes prohibitingnondiscrimination on the basis of handicap, such as section 504 of theRehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, may forbid a refusal to hire adrug abuser unless the individual's current drug use poses a danger topersons or property.)<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>These proposed regulations are considered to be non-major under ExecutiveOrder 12291 and significant under the DOT regulatory policies and procedures(44 FR 11034, February 26, 1979). A draft regulatory evaluation has beenprepared and placed in the rulemaking docket. It may be inspected or copiedat the Marine Safety Council (G-CMC/21) (CGD 86-067), Room 2110, U.S. CoastGuard Headquarters, 2100 Second Street SW., Washington, DC 20593, from8 a.m. to 3 p.m. Copies may also be obtained by referring to the <T2>``For Further Information Contact'' </T2>paragraph.The proposed regulations would require proof of an individual's drug-freecondition through the use of various testing programs. The proposed regulationsmandate periodic urinalysis in connection with required physical examinationsfor licensed and documented personnel, and pre-employment and random samplingof all employees aboard any vessel on which licensed, certificated, ordocumented personnel are required. The testing programs also contain requirementsconcerning reasonable cause and post accident testing. Under the optionsproposed for comment, rehabilitation would be made available to certainpersonnel testing positive for drug use the first time, or those who volunteerfor rehabilitation, with the opportunity to return to their previous positionafter undergoing a six month drug monitoring program. The Coast Guard doesnot believe these requirements will impose significant costs on eitherthe private or public sectors, and the costs will normally be proportionalto the size of the vessel or operation. There may be a substantial administrativeburden on the operators of small vessels and some individuals.Commenters should be aware that other operating administrations withinthe Department of Transportation also are proposing drug testing programs.Elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4> are NPRMs issued by Urban Mass TransportationAdministration and the Research and Special Programs Administration. Inaddition, the Federal Aviation Administration published an NPRM in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on March 14, 1988 (53 FR 8368); the Federal RailroadAdministration's NPRM was published on May 10, 1988 (53 FR 16640); andthe Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) published its NPRM on June 14,1988 (53 FR 22268). Each of these rulemakings addresses the costs and benefitsof the proposals and are generally consistent with one another. In someinstances, however, and generally as a result of differences in the industriesaffected, the assumptions differ from those discussed in this proposedrulemaking. Obviously, changes in assumptions could affect the costs andbenefits. Because of the nature of some industries, costs for similar elementsalso may vary or could vary enough to warrant sensitivity analyses. Otherchanges in assumptions, such as test costs or rehabilitation costs, alsocan have an affect on the economic analyses. Commenters may find it helpfulto review the notices of proposed rulemakings or the economic analysesprepared by the other operating administrations. Comparisons may aid commentersin reviewing data on this proposal and in formulating comments. In reviewingthe economic analysis and the basic assumptions made, commenters shouldaddress specific areas where they agree or disagree with the assumptionsand the basis for the comment. Commenters are directed to the other rulemakingsand their assumptions as a source of information in submitting comments.A copy of each of the documents has been placed in the docket.There were several alternatives considered. These included: Not addressingthe problem in regulation or policy; only requiring periodic drug screensfor personnel receiving physical examinations; requiring only pre-employmenttesting; requiring only random sampling programs; requiring only reasonablecause testing; requiring only post accident testing; having the Coast Guardor States conduct testing; or requiring random sampling programs in combinationwith periodic, pre-employment, reasonable cause, and post accident testing.The last alternative was determined to be the most acceptable, since allcrewmembers on vessels covered by the rules will be subject to random andpre-employment testing programs administered by employers, associations,and unions as well as providing for periodic testing of individuals holdinglicenses or merchant mariners documents. Random programs are believed tobe the most effective method in deterring drug use because of the increasedprobability of detection. Concurrently, those personnel not subject toa random screening program for the prescribed period of time or those initiallyapplying for employment in the merchant marine would still be screenedfor drug use. In addition, the evaluation of the role of drugs and alcoholin marine accidents will be possible. This approach facilitates programflexibility, increases probabilities of detection, eases the administrativeburden, lowers cost, and provides greater effectiveness, while at the sametime ensuring that all crewmembers on covered vessels are subject to testing.Program CostsThe approximate costs (in constant 1986 dollars) of the regulatory proposalassociated with the requirement for drug screening are as follows:Periodic Testing The estimated number of annual license and merchant mariners document transactionsthat require physical examinations (39,250), multiplied by the estimatedcost of an initial drug screen ($25), gives the total costs of initialperiodic drug test ($.98 million). Using that figure, and an assumed percentageof possible positive testings of 25%, gives an estimate of the number ofrequired second, confirmatory testings (9,812). Using a cost of $60 perconfirmatory screen the average annual cost expected for confirmatory testsis $.59 million. The total estimated annual cost of the periodic drug screeningwould be $1.57 million. If all the individuals subject to periodic testing are enrolled in employer-sponsoredor equivalent testing programs, and therefore eligible for testing at costscomparable for pre-employment and random sampling ($15 for initial tests,and $25 for confirmatory tests), the total estimated annual cost of theperiodic screening would be reduced to $.84 million. It should be noted that these testing costs do not take into considerationthose individuals obtaining raises of grade who have had physical examinationsfor original licenses or renewals within three years nor those individualsholding First Class Pilot licenses but not serving on them and thereforenot required to receive an annual physical examination. Actual costs aretherefore expected to be less than those shown above. Preemployment Testing Programs Due to the career paths of many mariners, the costs of a preemploymenttesting program are extremely difficult to assess. Computation of the program'sestimated cost will be dependent on how preemployment testing is appliedand whether or not unions and other organizations are to be consideredemployers. It is estimated that 131,700 individuals are employed on vessels on whichlicensed, certificated, or documented personnel are required. Until commentsare received relative to application of this program, it is assumed, forpurposes of the evaluation, that 10 percent of the total individuals arenew to the industry each year, and, of the remainder, 20 percent changeemployers each year. Therefore, an estimated 36,876 mariners would receivepreemployment testing annually. Multiplying the number of mariners tested by the cost of an initial drugscreen ($15), it will cost $.55 million for initial preemployment drugtests. Assuming a need to confirm a percentage of possible positive testingsof 25%, the projected number of required second, confirmatory testing is9,219. Multiplying this figure times the estimated cost of confirmatorytests ($25), it is estimated that it will cost $.23 million for confirmatorytesting. With an average annual administrative cost of sample testing of$.23 million (36,876 + 9,219 x $5), the total estimated annual cost ofthe preemployment testing program is $1.01 million. <ITAG tagnum="21">(<T4>Note._</T4>Estimated testing cost is lower for preemployer testingthan periodic testing due to volume contracts.) </ITAG>Random Sampling Programs <ITAG tagnum="21">(<T4>Note.</T4>_A 125% random selection rate is used for this analysis.This is the same rate used by the Coast Guard for testing its militarypersonnel. If a lower rate is adopted in the final rule, the followingcosts will be correspondly less.)</ITAG>The total annual cost of the random sampling program is estimated to be$4.5 million. This was arrived at by assuming that out of an estimatedaffected population of 131,700 seamen, 125 percent are to be tested eachyear. Therefore, 164,625 samples are to be tested annually. Multiplyingthis figure times the estimated cost of an initial drug screen ($15), itwill cost $2.5 million for initial random drug tests. Assuming a need toconfirm a percentage of possible postive testings of 25%, the projectednumber of required second, confirmatory testing is 41,156. Multiplyingthis figure times the estimated cost of confirmatory tests ($25), it isestimated that it will cost $1 million for confirmatory testing. With anaverage annual administrative cost of sample testing of $1 million (164,625+ 41,156 x $5), the total estimated annual cost of the random testing programis $4.5 million.<ITAG tagnum="21">(<T4>Note.</T4>_Estimated testing cost is lower for random sampling thanperiodic testing due to volume contracts.) </ITAG>Reasonable Cause Testing Reasonable cause testing is discretionary, highly subjective, and contingenton the availability of more than one supervisor, as well as the level oftraining of the supervisor(s). In addition, there is little or no dataavailable concerning the incidence of drug use in the commercial marineindustry. For these reasons, it is difficult to estimate the number ofinstances in which such testing would be potentially necessary or undertaken,nor is it possible to accurately assess the cost/benefit impacts of suchtesting. In general, however, it is evident that the primary value of reasonablecause testing is its potential capability for detecting and determiningdrug use prior to the occurrence of marine casualties or other significantevents. It is not possible to estimate how many such incidents could beprevented. As discussed later, if even a small percentage of deaths, injuries,or property/environmental damage is prevented through reasonable causetesting, the benefits will outweigh the associated costs. As an estimate, it is believed that up to 7.5 percent of the seamen coveredby this program could be tested annually. The total annual cost of thereasonable cause testing is therefore estimated to be $.27 million. Thiswas arrived at by assuming that out of an estimated affected populationof 131,700 seamen, and a testing rate of 7.5 percent, 9,878 samples areto be tested annually. Multiplying this figure times the estimated costof an initial drug screen ($15), it will cost $.15 million for initialdrug tests. Assuming a need to confirm a percentage of possible positivetestings of 25%, the projected number of required second, confirmatorytestings is 2,470. Multiplying this figure times the estimated cost ofconfirmatory tests ($25), it is estimated that it will cost $.06 millionfor confirmatory testing. With an average annual administrative cost ofsample testing of $.06 million (9,878 + 2,470 x $5), the total estimatedannual cost is $.27 million. Post Accident TestingBased on historical data, there are approximately 4800 marine casualtiesper year. Of these, approximately 1900 can be considered ``serious marineincidents.'' It is estimated that, for various reasons, only 75 percentof the serious marine incidents will be able to conduct testing in a timelyand efficient manner. The following costs are estimated for those 1425incidents where testing will occur.Of the estimated 1425 serious marine incidents occurring each year andwhere testing will be possible, it is estimated 66 percent (950) will occurin locations where blood and urine samples can be collected at Americanmedical facilities within 24 hours. Using an estimate of three (3) personsbeing tested in each incident, 2850 samples will have to be taken. Multiplyingthat number by the estimated medical fees for obtaining the samples ($50per sample), the cost of transporting personnel to be tested ($50 per individual),and the cost of shipping the samples to an approved laboratory ($50 persample), it is estimated that it will cost $.43 million to conduct thistesting. Adding this number to the cost of analyzing the samples ($100per sample), it is estimated that it will annually cost $.72 million toconduct this type of testing.Of the estimated 1425 serious marine incidents occurring each year andwhere testing will be possible, it is estimated 33 percent (475) will occurin locations where urine samples can only be collected by ship's crew.Using an estimate of three (3) persons being tested in each incident, 1425samples will have to be taken. Multiplying that number by the estimatedcost of shipping the samples to an approved laboratory ($50 per sample),it is estimated that it will cost $.07 million to conduct this testing.Adding this number to the cost of analyzing the samples ($100 per sample),it is estimated that it will annually cost $.21 million to conduct thistype of testing.In addition to the testing, the cost of providing shipboard sample kitsand EBTs are necessary. It is estimated 35,000 kits will be purchased ata cost of $25 apiece for a one time cost of $.88 million. Each year, dueto accidents, 1425 kits would have to be restocked for a cost of $.04 million.Additionally, there are approximately 1600 vessels certificated for unrestrictedocean routes, or for restricted overseas routes, which will provide anEBT at an approximate cost of $440 apiece, for a total cost of $.7 million.Training for personnel to use EBT (approximately 9600 people) is estimatedto be $4.8 million if it costs $500 to train each one. The total equipmentand training costs will be approximately $5.72 million.The costs of the post casualty testing requirements is $6.65 million.RehabilitationThe costs involved with rehabilitation and drug monitoring are difficultto compute since the type of services available vary with the drug involved.Also, the number of personnel who will take advantage of the opportunityfor rehabilitation are unknown. However, the following are offered as estimatesfor the total costs of Option 1, the broadest option under consideration.<ITAG tagnum="21">(<T4>Note</T4>_The detection rate used for this analysis is based on a 125%random selection rate. If a lower random selection is adopted in the finalrule, the detection rate, and the following costs, will be correspondinglyless.)</ITAG>The number of persons employed on vessels required to have individualsholding a license, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners documentis estimated to be 131,700. Multiplying that number by .075 (7.5 percentestimated detection rate), the total number of personnel who could be eligiblefor rehabilitation is 9,878. Multiply that number by .33 (33 percent) todetermine the number of personnel who are eligible for, and undergo, rehabilitation(3,260). An estimated 67 percent of detected drug users will not undergorehabilitation because they: (1) Refuse to be rehabilitated; (2) are noteligible for rehabilitation because they are temporary employees; (3) willdecline the opportunity for rehabilitation; or (4) will be subject to terminationof employment and/or subject to suspension or revocation proceedings becausethey tested positive for drug use a second time. This percentage appliesto the marine industry and reflects the composition of its workforce.Multiply that figure by the maximum estimated cost for an in-patient rehabilitationprogram ($13,000) to receive the estimated annual cost for in-patient rehabilitation($42.4 million). The Coast Guard is proposing that all persons undergoin-patient rehabilitation. 46 U.S.C. 7704 mandates that a person be ``cured''in order to forego revocation of their license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document. Since many individuals detected for druguse may not require full in-patient care, lowering this 100% requirementto another percentage, e.g. 5% as has been used by the FAA in their NPRM(March 14, 1988, 53 FR 8368), would decrease the costs substantially.Multiply the number of individuals undergoing rehabilitation by the maximumestmated cost for a six month out-patient monitoring program ($1,800) todetermine the cost of out-patient rehabilitation ($5.9 million). The totalannual estimated cost of rehabilitation is $48.3 million.No estimate is offered for the costs of employing an individual duringrehabilitation or rehiring them after rehabilitation. There is no requirementthat the individual be paid during rehabilitation, therefore, the costsof paying an employee during rehabilitation will depend totally upon companypolicy or the labor agreement an employer has with the employee. Costscan range from the price of the rehabilitation solely, to full pay up tosix months or more.Administrative costs will also vary, being dependent upon the type of programan employer adopts. However, for the majority of employers, it is believedthe administrative costs will be minimal since most employers will contractout for rehabilitation services and include the administrative costs inthe total rehabilitation cost.Option four, which does not mandate any type of rehabilitation program,would have negligible costs.TransportationPeriodic, Preemployment, Random and Reasonable Cause Testing: The costsassociated with transportation and test taking are difficult to accuratelycalculate since such numbers are entirely dependent upon whether the merchantmariner will have to go to a laboratory or other facility for testing orwhether test samples will be collected incident to employment. Many sampletakings will be conducted during an individual's free time, since the requirementfor a test is for a personal license, certificate, or document. However,it is assumed that, for the most part, mariners will be within one-halfhour of a testing facility when located at their residence, place of employment,or Regional Examination Center, and that it should take fifteen minutesto complete a test. Therefore, it is projected that it will take a typicalmariner one and one-quarter hours to complete this requirement, with themajority of testing during an individual's free time. Also many employerscurrently have some type of testing program in place that, with littleor no program alteration, may meet the criteria the Coast Guard is proposing.Rehabilitation: The costs associated with transportation are difficultto accurately calculate since such numbers are entirely dependent uponwhether the merchant mariner will have to visit a rehabilitation or monitoringcenter or whether the employer will have a program run at the place ofemployment. However, it is assumed that, for the most part, mariners willbe within one-half hour of a rehabilitation or monitoring facility whenlocated at their residence or place of employment. Therefore, it is projectedthat it will take a typical mariner one hour travel to complete this requirement,with the majority of this time during an individual's free time.Option four, which does not mandate any type of rehabilitation program,would have negligible costs unless an employer chose to provide for rehabilitationvoluntarily.Post casualty Testing: For the 1425 serious marine incidents after whichtoxicological sampling will be feasible, it is estimated that an averageof 1 hour will be required to transport individuals to and from medicalfacilities for blood and urine sampling following approximately 950 incidents,and 1 hour will be required for collecting samples. An estimated 3 personswill be subject to sampling for each incident. This will result in 5700hours expended by the persons being tested. Also an estimated 2 supervisorypersonnel will be necessary for witnessing and documentation. These individualswould require 1 hour for the round trip to the medical facility, 1 hourat the medical facility, and 1 hour for completing documentation and forarranging shipment of samples to the designated laboratory. This wouldresult in 5700 hours expended by supervisory personnel. The total hoursassociated with obtaining blood and urine samples at medical facilitieswould be 11,400 hours.It is estimated that toxicological sampling aboard vessels will occur followingapproximately 475 serious marine incidents. An estimated 3 persons perincident would be subject to sampling, and 0.5 hour would be required forthe urine sampling and breath alcohol testing procedure. This would resultin 713 hours expended by persons providing samples. An additional 2 supervisorypersonnel would participate for witnessing and documenting the sampling.Approximately 0.5 hour per person sampled and tested would be expendedby the supervisors, as well as 0.5 hour for completing required documentation.This would result in 950 hours expended by supervisory personnel. Finally,delivery of samples to a shipping location upon reaching port would requireone person approximately 1.5 hours roundtrip. This would result in 713hours expended in shipment of samples. The total hours associated withobtaining urine samples and conducting breath alcohol testing aboard vesselswould therefore be 2376 hours.The total hours required to support the proposed requirements for drugand alcohol testing following serious marine incidents would be 11,400+2376=13,776hours.Total CostThe total first year maximum cost of the drug testing programs, plus thecost of rehabilitation, is estimated to be:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p8,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s10,7</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Million</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Periodic testing<D>$1.57</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Preemployment testing<D>1.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Random testing<D>4.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reasonable cause testing<D>0.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Post casualty testing<D>6.65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rehabilitation<D>48.30</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>62.30</D></ITAG></ITAG>Based on experience with in place chemical testing programs, such as DODand the Coast Guard, the percentage of persons testing positive shoulddrop significantly over a period of time. Since the worker population inthe marine industry is highly mobile as compared to servicemen in the armedforces, no prediction can be made as to how fast this decrease in positivetest results will occur. Therefore, it has been assumed that costs willdecrease constantly over the first three years, and thereafter costs forconfirmation tests and rehabilitation should decrease to 33% of the amountscalculated above, thereby reducing the costs in subsequent years to approximately$22 million.Program BenefitsAs shown in a June 1984 U.S. Department of Health and Human Services reportentitled <T3>Economic Costs to Society or Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Mental Illness:1980, </T3>the economic costs to society at large from drug abuse is estimatedto be $66 billion annually. Using this annual figure, the total cost tosociety from drug abuse over the 10-year period following 1988 would be$405.5 billion more if corrective measures are not taken. Over 50 percentof the $66 billion estimate of the cost of drug abuse in society at largeis in the form of reduced income of drug users compared with those whodo not use drugs. Is it reasonable to assume that a corresponding percentageof benefits would result from increased productivity of the covered marineemployers? Are there more accurate estimates and estimating methodologiesthat should be used in estimating the potential benefits associated withthis proposal? The Coast Guard has placed the 1984 report in the publicdocket, and invites commenters to submit their views on the applicabilityof the study's conclusion to this notice.Although revisions to the casualty reporting program have recently beeneffected, existing data does not readily identify drug-related casualties;therefore, the Coast Guard will not estimate the total cost benefits ofthis proposal at this time. However, the following must be kept in mind.In 1984 there were approximately 2300 commercial vessel casualties (excludingfishing vessels), resulting in $237 million in damages and 68 deaths. Ofthese, 1133 were directly attributable to personnel-related causes, i.e.carelessness, misjudgment, etc., resulting in $77 million in damages and29 deaths. (It should be noted that these statistics do not include personneldeaths or injuries which are not associated with vessel accidents.)The Coast Guard believes that if drug screening can prevent even a lowpercentage of these accidents through drug testing and rehabilitation,the program will more than pay for itself. Using the minimum accepted valueof a human life of one million dollars, the saving of but a few lives annually,along with reduced property damage, will more than match the cost of theproposed program. This goal is believed achievable, given the success ofother drug testing programs.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG>The costs of the proposed random sampling will be proportional to the numberof personnel employed. For small vessels, having only two or three affectedcrew members, the cost should be in the range of $100 to $300 per year.For post-accident testing, the cost would basically be $25 for a samplingand shipping kit. However, as discussed previously in the preamble, eventhis seemingly low amount may have an adverse impact on small entities.Since the Coast Guard is considering a number of alternatives to this proposalfor small entities, it is not possible to evaluate the economic impactat this time. The Coast Guard has solicited comment on the impact on smallentities and will consider those responses and evaluate the impact priorto issuing a final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Assessment</ITAG>This regulatory proposal has been analyzed in accordance with the principlesand criteria contained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determinedthat the proposed rulemaking does not have sufficient federalism implicationsto warrant the preparation of a Federalism Assessment. The proposed rulesaffect the safety of vessels in interstate and foreign commerce and aredirectly related to the qualifications of personnel licensed by the U.S.Coast Guard and their working conditions on vessels. These are expressstatutory responsibilities of the U.S. Coast Guard and there are no similarState responsibilities or programs in these areas.<ITAG tagnum="84">Information Collection</ITAG>This proposed rulemaking contains information collection requirements inthe following sections proposed: Proposed subparts B and C, plus proposedsections 46 CFR 4.06-1 and 4.06-8. They are being submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget for approval under the Paperwork Reduction Act(44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et. seq.</T3>). Persons desiring to comment on these information collectionrequirements should submit their comments to: Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, 726 Jackson Place,NW., Washington, DC 20503, ATTN: Desk Officer, Coast Guard. Persons submittingcomments to OMB are also requested to submit a copy of their comments tothe Coast Guard as indicated under ``ADDRESS.''Commenters should especially provide their views on the accuracy of CoastGuard's estimates of the burdens associated with these requirements, thepractical utility of the information obtained, and less burdensome reportingalternatives to those proposed in this notice.<ITAG tagnum="84">List Of Subjects</ITAG>46 CFR Part 4Administrative practice and procedures, Investigations, Accidents, Marinesafety, National Transportation Safety Board, Reporting requirements, Alcoholand alcoholic beverages, Drugs.46 CFR Part 5Administrative practice and procedures, Investigations, Administrativelaw judge, Investigating officer, Seamen, License, Certificate, Document,Rehabilitation, Administrative hearings, Navigation (Water), Suspensionand revocation, Marine safety, Alcohol and alcoholic beverages, Drugs.46 CFR Part 16Seamen, Marine safety, Navigation (Water), Rehabilitation, Navigation (Water),Alcohol and alcoholic beverages, Drugs.<ITAG tagnum="84">Proposed Rule </ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, Title 46, Chapter I, of the Codeof Federal Regulations, is proposed to be amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 4_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1-2. The authority citation for Part 4 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1231, 43 U.S.C. 1333; 46 U.S.C. 103, 2306,6101, 6301, 6305, 50 U.S.C. 198; 49 CFR 1.46, except subpart 4.40 for whichthe authority is: 49 U.S.C. 1903(a)(1)(E); 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>3. Subpart 4.03 is amended by adding andSection;andSection;4.03-2, 4.03-4,4.03-5, and 4.03-6 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;4.03-2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Serious marine incident. </ITAG>The term ``serious marine incident'' includes the following events involvinga commercial vessel: (a) Any marine casualty as defined in andSection;4.03-1 of this part whichresults in any of the following: (1) One or more deaths; (2) An injury to a crewmember, passenger, or other person which requiresprofessional medical treatment beyond first aid, and in the case of a personemployed aboard a commercial vessel, which renders the crewmember unfitto perform routine or emergency vessel duties; (3) Damage to property, as defined in andSection;4.05-1(f) of this part,in excess of $100,000; (4) Actual or constructive total loss of any vessel subject to inspectionunder 46 U.S.C. 3301; or (5) Actual or constructive total loss of any self-propelled vessel, notsubject to inspection under 46 U.S.C. 3301, of 100 GT or more. (b) A discharge of oil of 10,000 gallons or more into the navigable watersof the United States, as defined in 33 U.S.C. 1321, whether or not resultingfrom a marine casualty. (c) A discharge of a reportable quantity of a hazardous substance intothe navigable waters of the United States, or a release of a reportablequantity of a hazardous substance into the environment of the United States,whether or not resulting from a marine casualty. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;4.03-4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Person directly involved in a marine casualty or serious marine incident.</ITAG>The term ``person directly involved in a marine casualty or serious marineincident'' is a person who supervises, performs assigned duties in connectionwith, or otherwise actively participates in, any vessel operation or anyactivity occurring aboard a vessel which is a significant factor in theevents leading to or causing a casualty or serious marine incident. Theterm ``person directly involved in a marine casualty or serious marineincident'' also includes any individual serving aboard a commercial vesselwho is fatally injured or who is injured to the degree specified in andSection;4.03-2of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;4.03-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Medical facility. </ITAG>The term ``medical facility'' means an American hospital, clinic, physician'soffice, or laboratory, where blood samples can be collected according torecognized professional standards and urine samples can be collected consistentwith 46 CFR 16.301. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;4.03-6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Qualified medical personnel. </ITAG>The term ``qualified medical personnel'' means a physician, physician'sassistant, nurse, emergency medical technician, or other person authorizedunder State or Federal law to collect blood and urine specimens. 4. Section 4.05-1 is amended by revising paragraph (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;4.05-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of marine casualty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) Injury which requires professional medical treatment beyond first aidand, in the case of a person employed on board a commercial vessel, whichrenders the crewmember unfit to perform routine or emergency vessel duties.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. A new Supart 4.06 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 4.06_Mandatory Drug and Alcohol Testing Following SeriousMarine Incidents Involving Commercial Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-1 Responsibilities of the marine employer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-5 Responsibilities of persons directly involved in serious marineincidents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-10 Blood and urine sample collection at a medical facility orby qualified medical personnel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-15 Testing with evidential breath testing devices (EBTs). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-20 Urine sample collection by the marine employer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-25 Sample collection in incidents involving fatalities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-30 Sample handling and shipping. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-35 Sample analysis and follow-up procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-40 Reporting and review of results. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.06-45 Employee Assistance Programs (EAPs). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 4.06_Mandatory Drug and Alcohol Testing Following SeriousMarine Incidents Involving Commercial Vessels</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of the marine employer.</ITAG>(A) All commercial vessels.(1) Following the occurrence of a marine casualty, a discharge of oil intothe navigable waters of the United States, a discharge of a hazardous substanceinto the navigable waters of the United States, or a release of a hazardoussubstance into the environment of the United States, the marine employershall make a timely, good faith determination as to whether the occurrencecurrently is, or is likely to become, a serious marine incident.(2) When it is determined that a casualty or incident has occurred thatmeets, or is likely to meet, the criteria in andSection; 4.03-2, the marineemployer shall take all practicable steps to assure that any person directlyinvolved in the casualty or incident is transported to a medical facilityor to qualified medical personnel for the purpose of obtaining blood andurine samples as soon as possible, or to transport qualified medical personnelto the vessel for the same purpose as soon as possible, when it is feasibleto do so within 24 hours after the incident. This requirement shall notbe construed to inhibit those vessel personnel required to be tested fromperforming duties in the aftermath of a serious marine incident, when suchperformance is necessary for the preservation of life or property, or theprotection of the environment.(3) The marine employer shall ensure that a blood and urine sampling andshipping kit meeting the requirements of andSection; 4.06-30 of this partis readily available for use following serious marine incidents. The samplingand shipping kit need not be maintained aboard each vessel if it can bemade available for sampling at a medical facility or by qualified medicalpersonnel within 24 hours from the time of the occurrence of the seriousmarine incident.(4) The marine employer shall ensure that all employees serving aboardvessels are fully indoctrinated in the requirements of this subpart, andthat appropriate licensed vessel personnel are trained as necessary inthe practical applications of these requirements.(5) The marine employer shall submit the following information on FormCG-2692B (Toxicological Sampling Report) to the Coast Guard after a seriousmarine incident:(i) Name of vessel, official number, date and location of serious marineincident.(ii) Names and other identifying data for each person directly involvedin the serious marine incident.(iii) Exact information concerning location and duties of each person directlyinvolved at the time of the serious marine incident.(iv) Whether or not sampling or testing was conducted. If not, an explanationconcerning why sampling or testing was not conducted.(v) The names and other identifying data for each person from whom urineor blood samples are obtained or who undergoes breath testing.(vi) Location of sampling or testing, either aboard vessel or ashore. Ifashore at a medical facility, name and address of facility.(vii) Type of sampling or testing conducted. If breath alcohol test wasconducted aboard vessel, specific results of the test.(viii) Identification of medical or vessel personnel conducting samplingor testing.(ix) Identification of medical or vessel personnel witnessing samplingor testing.(x) Exact disposition of all blood or urine samples following sampling(i.e. information concerning shipment to laboratory).(6) Following a serious marine incident, the Form CG-2692B shall be submittedas soon as possible to the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI),at the port in which the incident occurred or nearest the port of firstarrival. When blood or urine sampling is conducted, a copy of the formshall be forwarded to the designated laboratory with the samples.(b) Inspected vessels certificated for ocean or overseas routes.(1) When a serious marine incident occurs involving an inspected vesselcertificated for unrestricted ocean operations or involving an inspectedvessel certificated for a restricted overseas route, and it does not appearfeasible to transport involved personnel to a medical facility or to qualifiedmedical personnel within 24 hours, the marine employer shall ensure thaturine samples are collected and breath tests administered on board thevessel as soon as possible for any person directly involved in the casualtyincident. Breath testing and urine sampling shall be conducted in accordancewith the procedures outlined in andSection;andSection; 4.06-15 and 4.06-20of this part.(2) When a person directly involved in a serious marine incident cannotbe transported to a medical facility or to qualified medical personnel,and the person is unconscious or otherwise unable to indicate consent inproviding urine samples or participate in breath testing, the marine employeris not required to attempt to conduct breath testing or to obtain urinesamples on board the vessel.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of persons directly involved in serious marine incidents.</ITAG>(a) Any individual employed aboard any vessel on which an individual isrequired by law or regulation to be licensed, certificated, or documentedunder Subpart B of this chapter, who is determined to be directly involvedin a serious marine incident by their marine employer or a law enforcementofficer, shall provide a blood, urine, or breath sample when directed todo so by a marine employer or law enforcement officer.(b) Under andSection; 16.110 of this chapter, any individual employed aboardany vessel on which an individual is required by law or regulation to belicensed, certificated, or documented, is deemed to have given his or herconsent to toxicological sampling following serious marine incidents. Noindividual may be forcibly compelled to provide blood, urine, or breathsamples, however, refusal or failure to submit to sampling is considereda violation of regulation and will subject the individual to suspensionand revocation proceedings under Part 5 of this chapter, and/or terminationof employment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Blood and urine sample collection at a medical facility or by qualifiedmedical personnel.</ITAG>(a) When obtaining blood and urine samples under this subpart, the marineemployer shall comply with the requirements of this subpart and shall ensurethat the collection process is supervised by either qualified medical personnelfrom the medical facility, the marine employer, a law enforcement officer,or the marine employer's representative.(b) When urine samples are collected at a medical facility or by qualifiedmedical personnel, the marine employer shall ensure that the collectionprocedures specified in 46 CFR 16.301 are followed to the extent practicable.Certification of the sampling process and documentation of the chain ofcustody shall be accomplished through proper completion of applicable portionsof the Form CG-2692B (Toxicological Sampling Report).(c) When compliance with any procedure specified in 46 CFR 16.301 is notfeasible, the marine employer shall provide an explanation of the circumstanceson the Form CG-2692B.(d) Blood samples shall only be drawn by qualified medical personnel. Themarine employer shall ensure that the following procedures are observedafter collection of blood samples:(1) The individual providing the sample and the person supervising theprocess shall keep the blood specimen in view at all times prior to thesample being sealed and labeled. If the specimen is transferred to a secondcontainer, the person supervising the process shall request that the individualproviding the sample observe the transfer.(2) The person supervising the process shall request that the individualwitness the sealing of the blood specimen tube with evidence tape placedover the cap and down the sides. The individual shall also be requestedto initial the blood specimen tube and to witness the labeling of the tube.The person supervising the process shall label the tube with the time anddate, the individual's full name, and specimen number if assigned.(3) Certification of the sampling process and documentation of the transferof the chain of custody of blood samples must be accomplished through propercompletion of the Form CG-2692B (Toxicological Sampling Report).(e) The marine employer shall ensure that blood samples are promptly shippedto the designated laboratory following collection in accordance with proceduresoutlined in 46 CFR 4.06-30, and that urine samples are shipped accordingto 46 CFR 16.301.(f) In the case of an injured individual from whom samples are required,the marine employer shall request that the treating medical facility obtainthe necessary samples. If an injured employee is unconscious or otherwiseunable to indicate consent to the sampling procedure, and the medical facilitydeclines to obtain a blood sample after having been advised of the requirementsof this subpart, the marine employer shall immediately notify the nearestCoast Guard Officer in Charge of Marine Inspection (OCMI).(g) Nothing in this subpart shall be construed as limiting the discretionof qualified medical personnel to determine whether drawing a blood sampleis neither medically acceptable or advisable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing with evidential breath testing devices (EBTs).</ITAG>(a) All inspected vessels certificated for unrestricted ocean routes, andall inspected vessels certificated for restricted overseas routes, arerequired to have on board at all times an evidential breath testing device(EBT). EBTs must be selected from among those listed on the ConformingProducts List of Evidential Breath Measurement Devices amended and publishedperiodically by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA),Department of Transportation.(b) The marine employer shall ensure that evidential breath measurementdevices are maintained and calibrated through the use of a unit listedon the NHTSA Conforming Products List of Calibrating Units for Breath AlcoholTesters. The marine employer shall ensure that calibration is performedwith sufficient frequency to ensure the accuracy of the device, but notless frequently than provided for in the manufacturer's instructions.(c) The marine employer shall ensure that breath testing is conducted throughthe use of an approved testing device. Breath testing must only be conductedby a person trained and qualified to operate the breath measurement device.The marine employer shall ensure that appropriate vessel personnel receiveformal instruction in the following subject areas prior to being consideredqualified operators of breath testing devices:(1) The effects of alcohol on the body, including absorption, distribution,and elimination phases.(2) Scientific concepts and technology of breath testing as a means fordetermining blood alcohol concentration in the human body, as well as theoreticaland practical qualities of the particular breath testing device selectedby the marine employer.(3) Practical laboratory exercises involving the operation and calibrationof the selected testing device.(d) The marine employer shall ensure that operators of breath testing devicesreceive periodic refresher training following their initial qualification.(e) The marine employer shall ensure that breath testing is conducted inaccordance with procedures specified by the manufacturer of the testingdevice, consistent with sound technical judgment, and shall include appropriaterestrictions on ambient air temperature.(f) If a test indicates a BAC of .02 or more, the individual must be testedagain after the expiration of a period of 15 minutes, in order to ensurethat the test has properly measured the alcohol content of deep lung air.(g) Because of the inherent limitations of instrumentation, any indicatedbreath test result of less than .02 percent is deemed a negative test.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Urine sample collection by the marine employer.</ITAG>(a) When urine samples are collected by the marine employer, the marineemployer shall ensure that the collection procedures specified by 46 CFR16.301 are followed to the extent practicable. Certification of the samplingprocess and documentation of the transfer of the chain of custody shallbe accomplished through the proper completion of applicable portions ofthe Form CG-2692B (Toxicological Sampling Report).(b) When compliance with any procedure specified by 46 CFR 16.301 is notfeasible, the marine employer shall provide an explanation of the circumstanceson the Form CG-2692B.(c) The marine employer shall ensure that urine samples are promptly shippedto the designated laboratory as soon as the vessel reaches a location fromwhich the requirements of 46 CFR 16.301 may be satisfied.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sample collection in incidents involving fatalities.</ITAG>(a) In the case of a fatality occurring to the covered employee of a marineemployer as a result of a marine casualty, body fluid samples must be obtainedfrom the remains of the employee for chemical testing, if practicable todo so at an appropriate medical facility. To ensure that samples are obtainedin a timely manner, the marine employer shall notify the appropriate localauthority, such as the coroner or medical examiner, as soon as possible,of the fatality and of the requirements of this subpart. The marine employershall make available the sampling and shipping kit and request that thelocal authority assist in obtaining the necessary body fluid samples. Themarine employer shall also seek the assistance of the custodian of theremains, if a person other than the local authority.(b) If the local authority or custodian of the remains declines to cooperatein obtaining the necessary samples, the marine employer shall immediatelynotify the nearest Coast Guard Officer in Charge of Marine Inspection (OCMI)with the pertinent information.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sample handling and shipping. </ITAG>(a) As a minimum, a toxicological sampling and shipping kit must have:(1) Six (06) 4 ounce plastic urine specimen bottles with tight fittingscrew-type lids, (2) Twelve (12) 10 milliliter evacuated blood specimen tubes containingpotassium oxalate and sodium fluoride for sterile preservation, (3) A cardboard box suitable for shipping, measuring approximately 11 inchesx 8 inches x 11 inches, which contains an inner styrofoam liner, (4) A sealable quart can for ice, (5) A roll of evidence tape or other appropriate moisture-resistant, stick-onlabels for marking specimen bottles and tubes, and, (6) A set of Forms CG-2692B in triplicate, and (7) A sealable plastic bag for protection of forms or documents being placedin the shipping box. (8) A 3-tube styrofoam blood sample mailer. (b) The marine employer shall ensure that blood samples collected at amedical facility or by qualified medical personnel are shipped in a cooledcondition by pre-paid air freight (or other means adequate to ensure deliverywithin twenty-four (24) hours) to a designated laboratory. (c) Urine samples need not be shipped in a cooled condition by overnightdelivery. The marine employer shall ensure that urine samples are shippedby the next most expeditious means available. (d) The marine employer shall ensure that the shipping kit containing bloodor urine samples is securely sealed with tape and shall sign and date acrossthe tape. (e) The marine employer shall ensure that a copy of form CG-2692B, completedin accordance with andSection; 4.06-1(a)(5), if forwarded in the shippingkit along with blood or urine samples. (f) Samples shall be shipped to a laboratory approved by the Departmentof Health and Human Services. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sample analysis and follow-up procedures. </ITAG>Each laboratory will provide prompt analysis of samples collected underthis subpart, consistent with the need to develop all relevant informationand to produce a complete analysis report. A urine sample which indicatesthe presence of a dangerous drug at a level equal to or exceeding the levelsestablished by 46 CFR 16.301 is considered a positive indication of priordrug use by the individual providing the sample. A blood sample indicatingany concentration of alcohol is considered a positive indication of prioralcohol use by the individual providing the sample. Analysis results whichindicate the presence of alcohol or drugs shall not be construed by themselvesas constituting a finding of the probable cause of a serious marine incident.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting and review of results. </ITAG>The reporting and review of the results of urine tests for drug use shallproceed as provided by 46 CFR 16.301. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 4.06-45 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employee Assistance Programs (EAPs) </ITAG>The marine employer shall follow the requirements of 46 CFR 16.310, whichconcern employee assistance programs and rehabilitation. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 5_[AMENDED] </ITAG>6. The authority citation for Part 5 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 7101, 7301, and 7701; 50 U.S.C. 198; 49 CFR1.46(b).</ITAG>7. In andSection; 5.569 add to Table 5.569 the following new offense afterIncompetence: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 5.569 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection of an appropriate order. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>Table 5.569_Suggested Range of an Appropriate Order: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1,tp0,i1,s10,10</C>  <H1>Type of offense </H1><H1>Range of order (in months)</H1><ITAG tagnum="28">*     *     *     *     *</ITAG>Violation of Regulation:<ITAG tagnum="3">Failure to submit to required chemical test </ITAG><D>12-24</D><ITAG tagnum="28">*     *     *     *     *</ITAG></ITAG>8. A new Part 16 is added to Subchapter B to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 16_CHEMICAL TESTING </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.101 Purpose of regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.105 Definitions of terms used in this part. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.110 Implied consent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Required Chemical Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.201 Application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.205 Events requiring chemical testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.210 Required random sampling programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.301 HHS guidelines. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.305 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">16.310 Employee Assistance Program (EAP).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 2103, 3306, 7101, 7301, and 7701; 49 CFR1.46(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose of regulations. </ITAG>(a) The intent of the regulations in this part is to provide a means tominimize the use of dangerous drugs by merchant marine personnel and topromote a drug free and safe work environment. (b) The regulations in this part delineate the minimum standards, procedures,and means necessary to test for the use of dangerous drugs. (c) Nothing in this part is intended to limit an employer's ability toset lawful standards, procedures or means of testing employees for theuse of dangerous drugs in excess of the requirements contained in thisPart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions of terms used in this part. </ITAG>``Chemical Test'' means a scientifically recognized test which analyzesan individual's breath, blood, urine, and/or saliva for evidence of dangerousdrug and/or alcohol use. ``Dangerous Drug'' means a narcotic drug, controlled substance, or marijuana(as defined in section 102 of the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention andControl Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. 802)). ``Dangerous Drug Level'' means the amount of traces of dangerous drugsor their metabolites in an individual's breath, blood, urine, and/or saliva.``Preemployment Testing Program'' means a preemployment testing programwhich is sponsored and administered by an employer or sponsoring organization.``Random Sampling Program'' means a random sampling program which is sponsoredand administered by an employer or sponsoring organization, and satisfiesthe criteria contained in Subpart B of this part. ``Sponsoring Organization'' is any company, corporation, association, union,or other organization with which individuals serving in the marine industry,or their employers, are associated. ``Urinalysis'' means a chemical test of an individual's urine for dangerousdrugs. ``Vessel Owned in the United States'' means any vessel documented or numberedunder the laws of the United States; and, any vessel owned by a citizenof the United States that is not documented or numbered by any nation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Implied consent. </ITAG>(a) Any individual applying for, or acting under the authority of, a license,a certificate of registry, or a merchant mariners document issued underSubchapter B of this chapter after [the effective date of this rule], isdeemed to have given his or her consent to testing as required by thispart. Any individual accepting employment on board any vessel owned inthe United States on which any individual is required by law or regulationto be the holder of a license, certificate of registry, or merchant marinersdocument, is also deemed to have given his or her consent to testing underthis part. (b) Each individual subject to paragraph (a) of this section shall participatein testing as required under conditions set forth in this part, in Part4 of this chapter, and in 33 CFR Part 95. Refusal or failure to participateis considered a violation of regulation and will subject the individualto suspension or revocation of his or her license, certificate, or documentunder the procedures contained in Part 5 of this chapter and/or terminationof employment. (c) When an individual is required to be tested under Part 4 of this chapteror 33 CFR Part 95, and is taken to a medical facility for observation ortreatment after a marine casualty or incident, that individual shall bedeemed to have consented to the release to the Coast Guard of the following:(1) The remaining portion of any body fluid sample taken by the treatingfacility within 24 hours of the accident or incident that is not requiredfor medical purposes, together with the medical facility record(s) pertainingto the taking of such sample; (2) The results of any laboratory tests conducted by or for the treatingfacility on such sample; and (3) The identity, dosage, and time of administration of any drugs administeredby the treating facility prior to the time samples were taken by the treatingfacility or prior to the time samples were taken in compliance with thispart. (d) Any individual who is required to be tested under Part 4 of this chapteror 33 CFR Part 95, is deemed to have consented to removal of body fluidand/or tissue samples necessary for toxicological analysis from the remainsof the individual, if the individual dies within 12 hours as a result ofa marine casualty. (e) Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the use of physicalcoercion or any other deprivation of liberty in order to compel chemicaltesting.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Required Chemical Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application.</ITAG>The regulations in this Subpart apply to:(a) All individuals applying for, or acting under the authority of, a license,a certificate of registry, or a merchant mariners document issued underthis subchapter;(b) All other individuals employed or applying for employment aboard anyvessel owned in the United States that is required by law or regulationto engage or be operated by an individual holding a license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document; and,(c) All employers (1) owning or operating vessels owned in the United Statesthat are required by law or regulation to engage or be operated by an individualholding a license, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document,or (2) owning or operating vessels inspected, or subject to inspection,under 46 U.S.C. 3301.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Events requiring chemical testing.</ITAG>(a) Whenever a physical examination is required for an individual by thissubchapter, a urinalysis must be included as a part of the physical examination.If a physical examination is required for a license or merchant marinersdocument application, the applicant shall provide the results of the urinalysisadministered as part of the physical examination to the Regional ExaminationCenter. For those individuals required to receive physical examinationson a more frequent basis, the individual shall present to the RegionalExamination Center the results of all required urinalyses for the pastfive years when applying for license renewal.(b) The prospective employer of an individual applying for employment aboardany vessel owned in the United States that is required by law or regulationto engage or be operated by an individual holding a license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document, shall at the time of applicationrequire the applicant to undergo a urinalysis.(c) An individual to whom this subpart applies shall submit to a chemicaltest when directed to do so under Title 33 CFR Part 95, or when directedto do so under Part 4 of this chapter.(d) An individual who has been subject to a random sampling program underandSection; 16.210 of this part, and who has been tested under that programis not subject to the provision of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sectionprovided:(1) The urinalysis required by paragraph (a) of this section is not partof a physical examination for issuance of an original license or merchantmariners document; and,(2) The applicant provides satisfactory evidence certifying that he orshe has been continuously subject to a random sampling program meetingthe criteria of andSection; 16.210 of this part for not less than six months,has not tested positive for unacceptable dangerous drug levels, has notrefused to participate in required chemical tests, and has been testedwithin the past six months.(e) Each employer shall test each employee to whom this subpart applieswhen there is reasonable suspicion that the employee has used dangerousdrug(s) or alcohol in violation of this part and 33 CFR Part 95. At leasttwo of the employee's supervisors shall substantiate and concur in thedecision to test an employee who is reasonably suspected of drug or alcoholuse. At least one of these supervisors shall be trained in detecting symptomsof drug and alcohol use. The decision to test must be based on a reasonableand articularable belief that the employee is using a dangerous drug oralcohol on the basis of physical indications of probable use (e.g., theemployee's manner of speech or physical appearance).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Required random sampling programs.</ITAG>(a) Employers of personnel to which this subpart applies shall providefor the chemical testing of their personnel on a random basis for dangerousdrugs.(b) Random basis means that every member of a given population has an equalchance of selection on a scientifically valid basis. Random selection isto be accomplished through the use of a random-number table or computerbased, random-number generator.(c) The employer annually shall test on a random basis (a percentage ofcovered employees to be determined up to 125 percent).(d) All crewmembers on the following vessels must be subject to testingon a random basis:(1) Inspected vessels and vessels subject to inspection under 46 U.S.C.3301; (2) Uninspected vessels which are required by law or regulation to engageor be operated by an individual holding a license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document.(e) An individual may not be engaged or employed, including self employment,on a vessel in a position for which a license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document is required by law or regulation unless allcrewmembers are subject to a random sampling program.(f) The employer shall report the results of positive chemical tests tothe cognizant Coast Guard Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection.(g) Employers of personnel to which this Section applies shall maintainrecords of the results of their random sampling program sufficient to satisfythe requirements of andSection; 16.205(d). These records shall be maintainedfor a period of at least 5 years and shall be made available, upon request,to persons tested and Coast Guard officials.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">HHS guidelines.</ITAG>Drug testing programs subject to this regulation shall be operated consistentwith the ``Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs''published by the Department of Health and Human Services (53 FR 11970,April 11, 1988). Terms and concepts referenced in this part shall havethe same meaning as in those guidelines. Where the guidelines refer to``Federal agencies'' or ``the agency,'' this shall mean ``the employer''for the purpose of this regulation. This part contains requirements fordrug testing programs in addition to those in the HHS guidelines. Drugtesting programs governed by the regulation shall use only drug testinglaboratories certified by the Department of Health and Human Services underthe guidelines. These guidelines are available for inspection and copyingat U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters, Marine Safety Council (G-LRA-2/21), Room2110, 2100 Second Street SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 16.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) If a chemical test required under andSection; 16.205 of this part determinesthe existence of unacceptable dangerous drug levels as listed in the HHSGuidelines, the individual will be presumed to be a user of dangerous drugsand any license, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners documentapplication will be denied.(b) If a chemical test required under this part, Part 4 of this chapter,or 33 CFR Part 95 determines the existence of unacceptable dangerous druglevels as listed in the HHS Guidelines, the individual will be presumedto be a user of dangerous drugs. Subject to the rehabilitation optionsof andSection; 16.310 of this part, an individual who currently holds a license,certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document, will be subjectto suspension and revocation of his or her license, certificate, or documentunder Part 5 of this chapter. An individual who does not hold a license,certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document shall, subject tothe rehabilitation options of andSection; 16.310 of this part, be removedfrom the vessel or denied employment.(c) If a chemical test required under this part, Part 4 of this chapter,or 33 CFR Part 95 determines the existence of unacceptable dangerous druglevels as listed in the HHS Guidelines, the individual will be presumedto be a user of dangerous drugs and may not serve on a vessel subject tothis part, until:(1) That individual is rehabilitated, if the individual is not a holderof a license, certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document; or(2) That individual is reissued his or her license, certificate of registry,or merchant mariners document, if the individual is a holder of a license,certificate of registry, or merchant mariners document.(d) Regardless of the rehabilitation options specified in andSection; 16.310of this part, if a chemical test required under this part, Part 4 of thischapter, or 33 CFR Part 95 determines the existence of unacceptable dangerousdrug levels as listed in the HHS Guidelines, and this is the individualssecond confirmed positive test, the individual will be presumed to be auser of dangerous drugs. An individual who currently holds a license, certificateor registry, or merchant mariners document, shall be subject to suspensionand revocation of his or her license, certificate, or document under Part5 of this chapter. An individual who does not hold a license, certificateof registry, or merchant mariners document shall be removed from the vesselor denied employment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;16.310 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employee Assistance Program (EAP). </ITAG>The employer shall provide an EAP for all employees. The employer may establishthe EAP as a part of its internal personnel services or the employer maycontract with an entity that will provide EAP services to an employee.Each EAP must include education and training on drug use for employeesand the employer's supervisory personnel and an opportunity for rehabilitation,as provided below: (a) EAP rehabilitation program (Option 1). (1) Each employer shall provide one rehabilitation opportunity for thefollowing employees: (i) Each employee who voluntarily enrolls in an EPA; (ii) Each employee who is identified as a dangerous drug user through random,periodic, reasonable cause, or post casualty testing. (2) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who: (i) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment or notification to the employee that he or shehas failed a drug test; (ii) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug monitoringplan for employees who undergo rehabilitation; and (iii) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program. (3) Employees who are identified as having used dangerous drugs on thejob are not required to be afforded an opportunity for rehabilitation orto be retained or rehired. (b) EAP rehabilitation program (Option 2). (1) Each employer shall provide one rehabilitation opportunity for thefollowing employees: (i) Each employee who voluntarily enrolls in an EAP; (ii) Each employee who is identified as a dangerous drug user through randomor periodic testing. (2) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who: (i) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment or notification to the employee that he or shehas failed a random or periodic drug test; (ii) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug monitoringplan for employees who undergo rehabilitation; and (iii) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program. (3) Employees who are identified as having specifically used drugs on thejob or through reasonable cause or post casualty testing required by thispart are not required to be afforded an opportunity for rehabilitationor to be retained or rehired. (c) EAP rehabilitation program (Option 3). (1) Each employer shall provide one rehabilitation opportunity for eachemployee who voluntarily enrolls in an EAP. (2) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who: (i) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment; and (ii) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program. (3) Employees who are identified as having used dangerous drugs on thejob or through testing required by this part are not required to be affordedan opportunity for rehabilitation or to be retained or rehired. (d) EAP rehabilitation program (Option 4). (1) Each employer can decide its policy concerning whether rehabilitationwill be offered. (2) Individuals who are offered an opportunity for rehabilitation providedvoluntarily by the employer, and who wish to be retained or rehired totheir previous or similar position, should: (i) Successfully complete his or her first rehabilitation program; and(ii) Receive a recommendation for return to duty as a result of that rehabilitationprogram. (e) EAP education program: Each EAP education program must include at leastthe following elements: Display and distribution of informational material;display and distribution of a community service hot-line telephone numberfor employee assistance; and display and distribution of the employer'spolicy regarding drug and alcohol use in the workplace. (f) EAP training program: Each EAP training program must be conducted annuallyemployer's supervisory personnel. The training program must include atleast the following elements: The effects and consequences of drug andalcohol use on personal health, safety, and work environment; the manifestationsand behavioral cues that may indicate drug and alcohol use and abuse; anddocumentation of training given to employees and employer's supervisorypersonnel. EAP training programs for employees and supervisory personnelmust consist of at least 60 minutes for each employee and supervisor. <ITAG tagnum="21">Date: June 30, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">P.A. Yost, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Admiral, U.S. Coast Guard, Commandant. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15137 Filed 7-7-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>